“Oh bless me Lord, bless me Lord”
The baby gnome is made using 1/2" round ball and a 1/2" x 5/8"; 1/4"hole Candle Cup.
Mr. Sapiens: Oh! A thousand apologies to you. How do dietary fibre, vegetables and fruits prevent constipation?
Luckily for me, I wasn’t hurt too bad – there were even three people that stopped by to make sure I was okay. Because of my weight, I could not stand up so I decided to slide down and wait there for my partner.
Of course we have to use one of Stampin' Bella's stamps but I do have a few to choose from!!! I stamped this one on water colour paper so I could use my water colour pencils...and added some Stickles of course. The paper is from various sources - yes, still using up the stash. Pretty straight forward, not special but still a nice birthday card.
But I don’t sense affection
Once I began my own mothering I felt the need to celebrate my mother's efforts in the mothering department. But she did it a dozen times over (yes, she had twelve children) and that really does deserve some recognition. But me, I hadn't done anything I didn't want to do. I had my four beautiful children because I wanted them, so why should they feel obliged to me?
In walked Suzy Campbell,
The retreat was held at her family home in Tularosa, New Mexico. This southern New Mexico home was an actual military fort used by the Spanish and has served as the family's private residence for three generations.
Holy Spirit- the third Person of the Trinity who comes to us in Baptism and fills us with God’s life
The basic package on offer from UKUnpublished provides:
Coming through the ceiling of my laundry room.
Bailey is a two-time recipient of the Medal of Valor, the department’s highest honor. Weinzettel is a one-time recipient of the medal.
Pendant: Etsy, sellers are no longer in business
Our love for one another needs to be open, authentic, submissive, and renewed daily.
I don’t know H. Maybe I was too naive to be sure that it called love. But you’ll forever be my first even when my heart doesn’t allow me to call you my D and I only think of you occasionally with a smile.
Shirts on reserve
Coming Wednesday: Yogi Berra and Ron Guidry autographing details!
The kids had a great time and learned a little something about air movement and wind.
Growing up my dad always went to the office early, in high school he would drop me off at seminary (6:00am) and go to work. His office is in one of the biggest bank buildings in Tyler, which he bought sometime after moving in. To us the coolest part about him owning the bank building was that on Saturdays if he went up to the office we got to go with him. We would sit across the desk and draw or fill out pretend stock orders. It was so fun to go with him and see just a few other people there in jeans and t-shirts when it was usually filled with people in suits.
The scene was attended by police and emergency services workers.
Multiple blasts and gunfire have been heard in the center of the Afghan capital Kabul. The central district is home to a number of international embassies, although the site of the violence is unclear. Residents were reportedly running for cover and sirens wailing in the Wazir Akbar Khan district.
5. Vast
I realized yesterday how much food I walk past on a daily basis. So here’s the list of the places I walk past everyday that smells so tempting
Maybe that is why he puts his unqualified wife’s name as Director of the company?
Additional hints about the widespread, uncontained disposal of radioactive wastes of every type and description can be gleaned from many of the U.S. military source point citations; the question now is what is the location and what are the quantities of other isotopes characterizing reprocessed spent fuel including 238Pu, 241Pu and 242Pu which have been produced as waste during the production of more than 30,000 nuclear weapons? When will the Department of Energy reconcile the ORNL Integrated Database (IDB) with the report Plutonium: The First 50 Years issued in February of this year? The necessity for this reconciliation is noted at the end of the report on page 79: “The Department has formed a working group to analyze NMMSS, IDB, and other Departmental tracking systems and to make recommendations on the appropriateness of integrating the various inventory systems or developing a new tracking system for all forms of plutonium.”
Not too sour. Definitely a wild ale. A bit different than I was expecting. To tell you the truth I wanted more funkiness out of it. This beer was aged in Zinfandel barrels, which is easy to see...well taste. Whilst drinking this my burps tasted like "wine burps." Too much information?
One pkg (10 yards) Brown & White Baker's Twine
Don’t wait until the last day of our life.
Crackle paint picket fence,
I had another great day at the I Heart Market. I love being able to interact with buyers. To see people's reactions is just magical for me. I love it! I'm starting to get regular customers which is exciting. And customers that are especially coming to buy my goodies.
-red (what I have now)
CloudOn does several things right. First, it uses your Dropbox or Box cloud storage to save and access the files you are working on, and you can use both services, such as to separate personal and work projects. That means no messy file transfers before you go or when on the road, as OnLive requires. Your files are accessible from a variety of devices, including your iPad for access by other apps. If you use Box’s enterprise service offering, you can even take on files in a workgroup setting and under IT management policies.
During a radio interview that day, the former ex-quitting half-term Governor of Alaska told a conservative host that she could actually be more influential and powerful if she was not in fact, elected to the most influential and powerful office in the world. She said, “Not being a candidate, really you are unshackled and you’re able to be even more active. I need to be able to say what I want to say.” This type of confusing double-speak of course, was a Palin trademark since that unfortunate day in 2008 when John McCain unleashed the “Disaster from Alaska” on the Lower 48.
So the haberdasher's counter has many a tale to tell.
On that note, have you ever stopped to consider that Jesus repeatedly offers forgiveness of sins to those he meets before his death by saying, “your sins are forgiven” or “your faith has saved you”? This does not make sense when viewed from the perspective of the “blood hymns” that require faith in a sacrificial interpretation of Jesus’ death, but it makes perfect sense from the perspective of the anti-sacrifice prophets that require faith in a non-sacrificial path of compassion.
One of the paintings in the above book is this one of Cockington in Devon, it brings back a lot of happy memories for me as we always spent our annual holiday in either Paignton or Torquay when I was a little girl and we always went to Cockington. The painting is of the forge which dates back to the 1400s. When I was a child it was still a working forge, now I believe they sell miniature horseshoes to the tourists. Cockington is definitely one of those 'never go back' places I think, I'd rather remember the quiet, pretty village of my childhood.
July 2007
Five days with Romanian and Irish music, two cultures that intertwine, creative workshops and learning, events of all kinds, natural life, Sapanta.
████████air guitar
That's us, the Chosen race.
Is calling black people trash to his children
Boys don`t like to spend time on the beach in front of the camera, thay play , run, throw the ball.
What does it mean to please God? Is this about doing stuff for him? Is it about checking everything off the spiritual "to-do list," and leaving everything unchecked on the "do-not-do list?" Is it my ministry, my "sacrifices," my giving or volunteering that please God? Or is it my willingness to just be still in his presence that truly pleases him?
OSHA 10 Hour Online Training Course Summary
We don't know a whole lot about composting but I am sure we will be learning quickly...
I remember her voice on the phone. "Are you home with Cooper?" Long pauses as I tell her the heartbreak and then Catherine's response, "Oh Tiff." After even more empty pauses for tears she said she is coming over. 10 minutes later Catherine pulls in the driveway and rushes in the door. She holds me as I sob.
I guess that’s just how life is though, full of surprises, trials, laughs… and confuzzling sentence skeletons (Ick). But, at least I know that I’ve got God, so what am I worried about? I may do horrible in my worst subject, (English, are you surprised?) but I guess that’s what perseverance is for, right? (Nod your head so I know you’re paying attention.)
Don’t gloss over that. Timothy was 10-12 years old when Paul first looked at him and said: “In the Messiah, there is neither Greek nor Jew, Timothy. Everyone is equal. All the social layers and the hatred that this world constructs … it means nothing in Jesus, Tim. Nothing!”
Receptions are the lifeblood of the annual meeting. As a common member you only get invited to the welcome reception and the last night (but you cannot expect to do much networking there - though if you make some friends you may be able to consolidate relationships).
I’m trying to get the psychology at work here. I just looked through an image search of magazine covers featuring George W. Bush. They focused on the decisions he made. Bush was the definer in chief, he arrived on the scene fully-formed: resolute even when wrong, man of faith, yada yada.
We haven't heard where our stuff is, still in Barcelona or has it arrived to Casa.
On a ‘random urban discovery’ note, I came across these lovely flowering and fruit-laden roselle bushes in a gravelly parking lot on Nimmanhaemin Road. Roselle is a species of hibiscus.
An Old Fashioned Christmas
b) Dampers, hydraulics or any form of time dependent component or structure.
The ten of us in class took challenge seriously.
In addition to the loss of commercial farmers, more than 1 million black African farm workers have become unemployed and have had to move their families to squatter camps. In total, approximately 5 million people have been displaced.
20. Scottish city Aberdeen is known as Europe’s oil capital, or the “Granite City”.
Despite the sad belief, Josef and Lenka couldn't stop thinking of each other as they grit their teeth and try to move on with their life. Lenka faces fear and death every day, as she and her family are being transported to the concentration and labour camps and are forced to work for the Germans, be it hard labour work, painting postcards or even drawing plans for the Germans. However, Lenka's nightmare doesn't end there for they are later transferred from Terezín to Auschwitz where they are faced with more brutality treatments. Lenka is lucky to survive but her family and many of her friends aren't that fortunate as they are either gassed or shot to death.
Apparently Washington (State) right now has an outbreak of whooping cough ("The Great Whooping Cough Outbreak of 2012") and my mom keeps harassing me and my brother to get a Tdap booster shot. It's kind of cute, really, because I keep getting text messages or picture tweets like this:
Action, Parasites, and Savior. These three words sum up Rex Rising in a nutshell. Combine those 3 words with an unlikely hero and an amazing supporting cast, and you get a book that will have you speed reading through the dead of night. My secret— I read this book in 3 hours. A testament to how good it was.
Do you want to go shopping? As in, in person? Great, let's go to the mall! Let's see, while you're at: H&M, J. Crew, Banana Republic, Gap, Old Navy, Anthropologie, Eddie Bauer, Ann Taylor, and the department stores, I could hit Lane Bryant (if we're in a downscale mall) for crappy polyester, and whatever department store has a small plus size section somewhere in the basement next to housewears for more polyester. We could all go shopping at cheap big box stores -- Kohl's and Target. Want to go shopping somewhere hip, like Melrose Ave. in LA? Well, I'll just be over here looking at earrings, kthnxbi.
No, no and no.
and that leaning back was helpful.
A few choice quotes:
James 4:4 (King James Version) Ye adulterers and adulteresses, know ye not that the friendship of the world is enmity with God? whosoever therefore will be a friend of the world is the enemy of God.
This is a crusty bread that would go nicely with soup or chili. I mixed mine up to let it rise after dinner one night and baked it the next day when I got home from work, letting it rise for 18 hours. I saw no difference in the dough from that morning to that evening, so I could have baked it earlier and next time I will. Don't be afraid of this dough either, when I put mine into the hot pan I just plopped it in there. I baked mine for 20 minutes more after removing the lid and it could have used a few more minutes, but yours may vary depending on your oven. I've included another recipe at the bottom that is very similar except it also uses beer. I will be trying it next.
Most of the working class and all women were still disenfranchised in Britain until 1918. So, what appears an obvious principle to us now was revolutionary until 1918…
Paragraphs MUST have 5 sentences (topic, 3 support sentences, conclusion).
J - Character gains the ability to speak Common for 2d20 days.
Mother’s Day growing up was always a special day. I have fond memories of this Sunday in May, often the perfect time of year – beautiful, sunny, and the ideal temperature. We’d spend time together as a family over brunch before we’d head out to visit my grandmothers. We’d treat my mom like a queen – presenting her with beautiful flowers, cards, and gifts wrapped in brightly colored tissue/wrapping paper/ribbon. In hindsight, more than half the fun was the opening itself — even before seeing what was inside.
Others I know about include Interface, Desso, Patagonia, P&G, Unilever, Natura, M&S, Seventh Generation, Ecover and Timberland.
Hi people!
OK this should have been done already but there you go.
Low ratings? Well considering the show has been going on since 2003 for a whopping 18 cycles it’s probably due to a bad case of ANTM fatigue. No really. Who can even keep track of these “cycles” anymore? And more importantly, where are these “top models”? Not at New York Fashion Week that’s for sure.
our own special blend of paint by which we paint the world. But like the
They are remarkable eating machines, neatly packaged in about an inch of greenness. They swing from slender threads like daring trapeze artists. Their sole purpose in life is to voraciously defoliate as many deciduous trees as possible in their lifetime. They’re in a hurry.
Because of the success of Human Hotspots, the leadership at SXSW has decided to expand this idea and take it global.
24And in her was found the blood of prophets, and of saints, and of all that were slain upon the earth.
She knows when that ripple in time is near.
The Agricultural Revolution in the 18th Century
Having a hard time finding them is not.
Hello I am Eddy Pula a Photographer, I showed up early to hear Werner Herzog famed documentary and narrative and docunarraitve (SIC) hybrid filmmaker show a new cut of his Into The Abyss, a short series on execution practices in the USA, at Amherst College. I was kicked out along with every other film making student in the area because too many paying alums wanted to come, so I snuck in the back door and walked up and took this picture of Hurzog while he answered some questions. Amherst college tried their best to make it happen, they ran a live feed to another hall but there was technical glitches and parts of the documentary and lecture were cut. So I got it done guerrilla style and helped sneak in like 10 other journalism students. There were a lot of angry intellectuals and you know what that means, lots of letters to the editors! Feel free to run this or just pass it along.
Of course it f***ing well is! Rationality… Logic… Common Sense… These things have no place in the same sentence as love. Think about this for a moment; if humans were rational beings they wouldn’t love at all. We probably wouldn’t paint either… or sculpt, or write songs. I mean, what’s the point?
Wishing yellow in every green of the blue flakes turning violet and indigo in the Navajo base
Place the text under each picture.
I'm not sure if any of these will work for my friend's wedding. I may just go with my hair down.
Other things of interest nearby.
I know that my mom is putting on a brave face while she crumbles inside.
In a related panel, a retired FBI agent pointed out that the FBI didn't get "computerized" until 1995. Prior to that, all records were kept in a huge room filled with filing cabinets, and the staff that worked there could locate anything you needed.
The transaction starts with Alice making an INVITE request for Bob. But Alice doesn’t know the exact location of Bob in the IP network. So it passes the request to Proxy1. Proxy1 on behalf of Alice forwards an INVITE request for Bob to Proxy2. It sends a TRYING response to Alice informing that it is trying to reach Bob. The response could have been different.
And guess who happens to be quite popular for selling it?
Almost, but just not quite, unbearable. That's what you would call what happens next in the film.
little Arnaudville brewery and his homestead’s smokehouse.
That afternoon I ventured into Asheville. I have rarely felt the same positivity and creativity from a city. Downtown was a painting in itself, covered with fascinating little shops and art galleries. There was part of a block that was sectioned off for construction, and someone painted a mural of a verdant city street on the boards, as though empty spaces couldn’t lie dormant and unused. I would love to spend longer there sometime. It is an energetic and powerful city that somehow came into existence in an intractably mountainous part of the country.
My sweet and very best friend KB was there with her family. And she spotted something.. i was trying to let the air fill my lungs.. trying to 'hold it together' on the outside while every piece of me was shattering on the inside. I thought she was just walking over to talk to the kiddos.. then I heard her say ladybug.. what??
Me: Uh huh
Stevie always takes his eye out when it gets to that part. Let’s us have a play so long as our hands are clean.
Good morning, lovelies! And happy Wednesday to you!
I know I usually talk about housey-type things on this blog, but it’s called “Well I guess this is growing up” and I couldn’t think of anything more fitting than our wedding plans. I’d best get started!
He skirted around the bar and helped himself. She crossed her arms and glared at him.
Here is my entry: Mr. Peacock shows off his feathers.
1. Peter Green version
The production moves swiftly and fluidly from scene to scene, and has some nice touches; I especially like the presence of the young prince Mamillius, who presides over the action in his blue-striped pyjamas like some kind of benign narrator-spirit, and who ends the show by blowing out a candle, plunging the stage into final darkness. The performances I enjoyed most were Dempsey's Hermione and Vince Leigh's Paulina, which attained moments of real poignancy, and were played without the slightest touch of camp. Here the notion of gender as a performance, central to so much of Shakespeare's work, comes to the fore and begins to invest the production with some interesting complexities.
How have you had to change your blog or posts to manage time?
Sorry. This was a trick quiz. All of the correct answers are the same person. Each of these quotes are directly from President Barack Obama. And now you know why he brings his teleprompter with him everywhere he goes... even when talking to a 6th grade class!!!
Roquefort
brother and sister anymore,
Papers - K & Co.
turn him hot with your
:: Galaxy Games :: While my parents were here we went to a Real Madrid - Galaxy game. Oli was not able to come but we did end up going to another MLS game this year. Viva la Football!
First of all, fighting is not actually allowed. It's just not penalized terribly well. They let them punch each other for a bit while they stay on their skates, then send them to the penalty box once they fall down. Hockey would be a lot more interesting if fighting were actually allowed and encouraged.
And yes, I am the dork who thinks its fun to dress my kids up in matching outfits. In fact, one of these days (before the boys think Mom and Dad are so totally unhip that they can't hang out with us anymore) I'm going to get my act together and plan costumes for all four of us around a theme.
I believe that these terrible upheavals are omens that the Earth, who bore the beautiful footprints of the All-Attractive, is now dispossessed and her fortune destroyed.
Raskin replied: "Senator, when you took your oath of office, you placed your hand on the Bible and swore to uphold the Constitution. You did not place your hand on the Constitution and swear to uphold the Bible." The room erupted into applause.
Here are the ATCs I received. I adore them all. Each one so unique and beautiful. The Celebrate Spring theme was definitely followed by these creative talented people. Thank you to Sylvia, Lynn, Liz, Troy, Karen and Danielle. I simply feel spoiled with these additions to my ATC collection.
Marilyn Monroe's Fragments
I'm very thankful that you came to visit my blog. And as a THANK YOU for your visit I will be giving away some candy: six Jolee's Boutique stickers sets, soooo beautiful!! All you have to do is to leave a coment (be sure to put your email so I can contact you if you are the winner) and be a follower (let me know if you already are) ... I will use Ramdom.org to choose the winner. Good luck!!!
Idecided to check the place out as soon as possible to opening time, at 12pm.
II. Focusing Attention on Oppression in the Remaining Unreformed Communist Governments
Schlafly Imperial Stout
A map is a term used for a room or place in an RM game.
- Straight LDS member, October 2010
We all feel that our past has marked us somehow – maybe not in an obvious way – but the scars are there, unseen to the human eye. The French, as a people, are a remarkable embodiment of the struggles and pain that their country has endured. Their solemn pride in the rich and magnificent landscape of France, the graceful beauty of the countryside and the shining brilliance of the cities transcends any language or cultural barrier.
Liberals care about harm and suffering (appealing to our capacities for sympathy and nurturing) and fairness and injustice. All human cultures care about these two things but they also care about three other things: loyalty to the in-group, authority and the sacred.
Hi folks...yesterday was a slightly manic day ticking things off the crafty list and getting organised for the "Altered Art" Night at The Papeterie and what a fun night we had with lots of lovely crafters...my snuggly warm bed is calling so I'll share all the Altered Art Crafty stuff with you on Sunday.
The family that runs together...is happy! Or should that be busy? Maybe both?! I am just so excited that I had to share our plans for "Marathon Weekend" as I am now calling it.
15.Peek-A-Boo (R&B Mix) 03:29
She brings him good, not harm, all the days of her life. Proverbs 31:12
Last year, the Staten Island, New York native Cappadonna released The Pilgrimmage, while Magnetic, a Philadelphia, Pennsylvania-based emcee, released his Watch Out EP.
My first post for Helmar has just gone live after trying to work out typepad etc :) Well you all know me and computers!!!!! But I got it right YAY for me ...
Spontaneous help is working a little and listening/empathy is hardly working at all. I'll be working on those and will hopefully have a positive post later.
Shankar asked: Why the barbwire?
As a postmodern deconstruction of the horror genre, “Cabin in the Woods” simply wouldn’t exist without the audience’s expectation of clichés. Whedon and Goddard know their horror films and they know exactly how to play with the classic predictability that audiences come to expect. That being said, the fiercely witty duo never mocks the genre. Everything in the film, while poking fun, is created from their deep love and respect for the films they grew up on. However, they have no interest in the torture porn that has become so popular with films like “Saw” and “Hostel,” and make it clear from the start that this is a very different movie. That’s not to say there isn’t a good amount of blood and guts, because there is, but “Cabin in the Woods” is on a mission to be more than that and it succeeds in ways you wouldn’t have thought possible. Whedon and Goddard made the ultimate horror film, a masterpiece that is wickedly funny and serves as the final act to a genre that has been overrun with self-referentially over-stimulated productions, with little point beyond the instant gratification.
Shout! Factory and Nickelodeon are “unleashing” the network’s classic 90′s Nicktoons fast and “furry-ous” in this first quarter of 2012. Among the new sets helping fans of the classics “scratch their itch” (is that enough bad puns?) is CatDog Season 1.5, or Season 1 Part 2. The zany adventures of this crazy canine feline (yes that’s a reference to the theme song) continue in the second half of this season. This time out, Cat learns that maybe being a collector of action figures isn’t all that it’s cracked up to be. Cat also learns the importance of honesty when he goes out on a date with his Swedish pen pal, Ingrid. He also realizes the importance of his friendship with his canine counterpart when he nearly gets the pair literally split up.
I'm glad I stumbled onto this little hardcore side note. I didn't think I was as much of a fan as I am. Go figure. It's still dumber than dirt. But hey- all we had back then was dirt.
I vaguely remember Michael Fassbender from Inglourious Basterds but, to be honest, I never really paid much attention to him. Until now. Damn, that boy can act too. I liked that he looked a little older than everyone else after what he’d been through during the holocaust and the scene in the bar in Argentina was one of my fave moments in the film.
He’s made connections like when the garage door goes up, dad is home and when the phone rings, he looks for it. He’s not much of a morning person (like his mom), because he cries in his crib when he wakes up and is fussy until he’s fed (like mom before her coffee)!
How to make the pastry:
Plus it rained in Adelaide.
Pat Marsh turned at the foot of the short rope ladder that led to the opening of the gondola of the stratosphere balloon, and held out his hand to the little, silver-haired Professor Anthony.
White and navy blue were a must have back then...nice to see they've made it overseas under the "fashion sneaker" category!
The general structure of the financial cabal and its top leaders has also now been mapped to some extent. For example, the Rothschild family dynasty leaders have been identified. The Swiss branch of the family is run by David de Rothschild in Geneva, the French branch by Guy de Rothschild, the German branch by Rothschild family member and Hitler daughter Angelina Merkel and the British branch by Evelyn de Rothschild.
Strangers on a Train, made three years later, gives Granger a similar premise and character. He plays another man, Guy Haines, trying to extricate himself from a situation he was lured into, the degree of Guy’s complicity being something even Guy can’t quite work out for himself. Certainly this handsome tennis player has violence in him, as when he grabs his scheming wife in front of a store full of customers and shakes her until a manager intervenes. Unlike Philip, Guy has enough of a self-preservation instinct to pull back at the last minute, however attractive he may find Robert Walker’s offer of murder, or indeed Walker himself.
Price: Moderate-High.
Our super-naughty always-on-the-scrounge cats have a bad habit of pinching food, especially off the kids, who are too slow to stop them (they'll learn). Ham, salami, chicken, cheese, even the bread from the sandwiches, all have been stolen off plates when we have food in the living room instead of at the table, though the cats have been known to try and swipe food from plates there too, the beasts.
"I brought you a gift," I told him. "All I ask in return is that while you're enjoying my absolute favourite muffin that you tell yourself, 'I am at peace'." All I want is for him to plant the seed.
I will be your guardian when all is crumbling. I’ll steady your hand. You can never say never while we don’t know when but, time and time again younger than we were before.
Why do we do that? Why do I do that?
How you respond to this message is not my problem. I feel obliged to share it as I feel you deserve it. After reading this you may feel a need to leave the city and move to an extremely remote area in SA by end Oct 2012. Things should settle and return to "normal" after 6 to 12 months.
I bought a Chinese fountain pen on eBay recently. The pen is nice enough. It has a really unique look and writes smoothly. Not a bad pen at all for the price. I'll be reviewing it shortly.
Beg you to come home
we exchanged our ‘good mornings,’ and he stood looking out of the kitchen window, sipping his coffee that smelled to me like it had been poured out of a dirty work boot.
The longing for the dance
These few degenerate ladies don’t speak for any decent family oriented women. There are many Women, live their lives with respect and passion. And south is full of them. God may bless those good women.
So now that that’s been clarified, I brought the fan up from the cellar today. I had a look at today’s workout and realized there was a good chance I might die if I didn’t get the fan upstairs, stat! I also prepped for what I imagine might happen during or after the workout: overheating.
We returned to our hotel to move our things to our new room; however, it was not ready. They said it would be just a few minutes so we decided to cool off and relax for a bit. At one o’clock we gave up and went down stairs. We asked when our room would be ready and if was a deluxe room, which we had booked. The young lady said that since we had the VIP room last night, we would get only a superior. We took issue with this as they had overbooked their rooms and upgraded us without our asking. We said that we expected a deluxe room, and the young lady said that she would speak to the manager.
In case there is any doubt, these kebabs were delicious. You Southerners out there might have grilled peaches all the time, but we were grilled-peach virgins before tonight. Wow! They're really, really good!
Have a wonderful weekend friends!
Ah yes, anyways… I think we all are familiar with the infamous “ScyFy B-Movie” (ScyFy being Klingon for “intentionally stupid”, one assume). I certainly am. With random monsters, awful acting, a lot of boobs, horrid writing, a lot of boobs, gore, boobs, and boobs, there are rather entertaining affairs. Certainly comedic. However, I find the Internet is gradually circumventing television in my life, due to the damn intercommies who need to learn their fucking place, thus preventing me from indulging in such guilty pleasures.
Thank you to all of the 2011 A to Zers. I couldn't have done it without you.
The service is available for free for a period of time with a Facebook login but you can upgrade to the unlimited plan without ads for $4.99 or choose the Premium plan with offline listing for $9.99 a month. You can read more about it on this wikipedia page.
Food should always be fun, which probably explains why I've taken such a shining to El Loco of late. There's nothing fancy, with Mexican-style street food served in takeaway trays and margaritas dispensed in plastic cups, but that's half the appeal - chowing down on messy deliciousness as you perch on a metal stool at a table covered in plastic prints.
So, some gulps of tea and I’m off. See you all later!
Since our plane did not leave until late in the evening, Andrea and I decided to take one last opportunity to see some wildlife. We took a boat across river from Iquitos to a butterfly pavilion. As we entered, we were first greeted by a group of red faced monkeys who climbed climb all over me. We were then greeted by a man holding a two-toed sloth. After a wonderful tour of the butterlies and breeding process we were taken to see the remaining animals including more monkeys, a jaguar, ocelot, agouti, capybara, and a variety of birds. The animals were all very well taken care.
12.SLANT 6 "What Kind of Monster Are You?"
I know this sounds silly, but I hadn't really thought about the fact that I'm moving to a different town. I still do lots in PV, still go to Story Time, bible study, church, and what not, but technically I am a Kitscotian now ( ha, I like that word!!). Its really nice to have the store here, and to be so much closer to lloyd, but now I really have to make a conscious effort to visit friends in PV and vice versa. Thankfully, its been going good so far!
The key separation would be between landed housing and non-landed flats. Landed housing comprises detached (bungalows), semi-detached, terrace and strata landed housing. Flats can be condominium developments (on sites of 0.4 hectares or larger) or non-condominium flats (on sites smaller than 0.4 hectares). For more information on these different housing types, you can check out this post.
Be sure to pop over to the Get Picky site to check out the dt's stunning layouts and also link up your own before the 28th to be in the running for the fantastic SRM sticker prize.
And I get to dance with my sisters.
10 Second Hand Stand Hold…(No Walls, Trees etc…) Followed by:
Conclusions: Numerous distinct autistic cognitive strengths, some of them highly replicated, in a wide range of areas, and displayed by a large number and great variety of autistic individuals, have been reported in the literature. Failing to acknowledge the importance of autistic cognitive strengths may impede efforts to understand autistic differences and assist autistic individuals. We recommend more consistent and transparent reporting and interpretation of autistic cognitive strengths and more attention to their importance.
Today Xander was extubated from the ventilator, weened off of the Fentanyl, taken out of the Billruben phototherapy, and the IV line in his right hand was removed. He still needs a cannula around his nose for oxygen and he also has a feeding tube up and down his nose, but he looks like a normal baby for the first time since his first hours of
Shall life renew these bodies of a truth?
Total Carbohydrates with nuts: 33.85
Clank...
Why I even forgave her, I don’t know. She obviously had something to do with last night but I didn’t even wanna think about that; at least I got my friend back.
HUNTINGTON: It’s a bummer when we don’t get to shoot together, very often.
00:30 – 01:30 Adaro
OHIM examined the case first by considering whether Dave Soho's use of the mark DAVE amounted to ‘prior use in the course of trade of a trade mark of more than mere local significance’. To do so it examined the detailed evidence put forward on the opponent's behalf, including history of trading under the name, ownership of URLs containing the mark, annual returns, receipt of industry awards, and examples of client accounts, including Nokia. OHIM explained that its assessment must take into account a number of factors including the territory in which the mark is used, the length of time and economic dimension of use, the relevant consumers, and the extent of advertising of the sign.
Bare feet! BARE FEET! WoW!
In the September 2008 version of All About Beer magazine, Don Russell writes and article called "Retro Beer," which chronicles the rise of beers like Pabst, Rheingold and Genny Cream Ale among hipsters and ironic college types.
a safety razor, three-piece, brass, Gillette;
Hers wasn’t a particularly churchy family, but they were Methodists, and she always jokingly, but half-seriously, blamed her strong sense of duty – work before pleasure, even though this meant the latter might be endlessly deferred, and putting others’ needs before her own – on her Methodist upbringing. For good or ill (both, probably), I’ve inherited some of that. Others who’ve known me at certain times will laugh, but it feels to be so, and it has coloured, even shaped, my own habits of writing.
Issued by Ronnie Mamoepa at 082-990-4853
So of course it’s all just misinformation, anti vaxxers yadda yadda yadda. Wow, you must have low expectations of people to honestly believe that peanut gallery bull. I highly doubt that people are just going to suddenly change their minds one day because they read an article somewhere. Something of this nature has to either be enforced into your life or some ‘shocking’ incident has to happen.
From lip balm to lip treatments, we’ve got all of our favorite lip products covered. And you better believe that Bare Escentuals made our favorites list for the second week in a row!
Incidentally, Jayden was easy to spot in a crowd. That jacket of his was pretty eye-catching.
However, The SA Communist Party and labour federation Cosatu, have been critical of his conservative fiscal stance and some of the policies he has supported, specifically the growth, employment and redistribution (Gear) strategy and inflation targeting policy.
"Pity it's only a dream", she sighs
But when these all have failed the test,
I find the vintage Solo Sleepeasy Plastic Brush rollers the best, although almost a tie with Wil-hold Plastic Brush Rollers. Both produce excellent results and easy to use, and the ability to secure them well so they don't loosen and yank outweighs the fact that they are a little prickly. And you really get used to them, particularity the Sleepeasy rollers and you do feel nicely set when done properly. Unfortunately these rollers are hard to find except in second had stores or eBay.
Really catchy and listen-able song, by the Australian band San Cisco. See what you think:
I look around and remember how you made love to me
I believe that the answer is that we cannot wait for a savior. We must all play a role in the next chapter of our history. No matter which Black history martyrs that you chose to research they all had one thing in common, they didn’t wait for someone else to form their destiny, they boldly faced the challenge. No, everyone will not be an explorer like Matthew Henson or an inventor like George Washington Carver, but let’s start by being the best Devonte or Keniesha we can be in this lifetime. Let’s show respect for those whose “Life ain’t been no Crystal Stair” and carry yourself with dignity in the street. Stop cursing and using the “N” word on the subway trains and when you speak in public places, chose a octave that allows others to enjoy themselves as well…And if you can do that, you would be a HERO in my eyes! Sometimes it just takes a change in the ways in which we think that will lead to better actions.
As the Director of the Children in the Fields Campaign, I am committed to helping the next generation of leaders in the farmworker community. Along with the help of dedicated staff, the Children in the Fields Campaign is encouraging farmworker youth and working to amplify their voices. We are especially excited for the enthusiasm we have seen in the youth. Although shy at first, once the kids are speaking, they share incredible stories of defeat and triumph. They have a contagious determination to change the world so other kids don’t have to continue in the generational poverty they were born into. The Children in the Fields Campaign youth council activities that took place this week gave local farmworker youth the opportunity to build their leadership skills and share their testimonies. We will be doing that again at the national level next month at our child labor conference, Youth Voices in Action.
Now we’re in Miami. Jinx is at the grocery store and James shows up just in time for her to slap him. Go Jinx! He’s here to say his final goodbye, apologizing for leaving, but thanking Jinx for all the good she did raising their daughters. But Jinx isn’t wooed by James’ words and he soon leaves. Jinx calls Mary to tell her what happened just after Mary’s been told she isn’t allowed to work on this case anymore. So James got away and continues to be on the run.
Gyoza: 1/10 May be this is a personal taste thing. I don’t like the taste of the ingredient in this Gyoza at all. I actually had a bite, spat it out, and left the rest on the plate. Yuck. (Let me know if you like the taste of it, provided you don’t work there! :)
Illustrator: Lucy Barnard
One author shared a venture she’s helping to spearhead to digitally publish backlists for others. Perfect! What strategies are they using to relaunch these books? Well, they’re covering the books, formatting them and putting them out on as many venues as possible because that’s how books get discovered. Um, could she elaborate on that? Elaborate? What was there to elaborate?
#2. spending holidays with family
“Whether I’m out on bail or not, especially if I’m not, if Darky even suspects betrayal, I’ll be killed.”
I painted for about an hour. I could have cried. I almost killed a beautiful butterfly that landed on my knee. I thought it was a stinkbug.
He may be aboard a spaceship or even on the moon, but he is definitely not on this planet. However, the clues he leaves are very important. You will also recall that he said “one of my associates will visit you in about 7 day’s time and you will have to tell him the truth about your situation.”
90 2. “Next Year in Athens?” Interview by John Anastaplo. WJOB-Radio, Hammond, Indiana. Congressional Record, vol. 116, pp. 3459-3461; Daily Record, pp. E935-E937 (February 16, 1970).
Again, I’m not White or a guy, but we did have that seething anger issue in common. If only a sharp sword appeared outta the blue…I’d also be in jail.
Your calendar
I like this Hello baby season because they have to take care of 3 kids which are multicultural kids. I like multicultural kids because their parents are from different country and it makes them different with other kids who are born from parents who are from the same country. Three kids in this program are Korean but one of each parent is a foreigner. They are all mixed. Those kids are looked good with their fake fathers, MBLAQ. They are a sweet family. (:
Help is on the way
Pre-heat the oven to 300*. In a medium bowl mix together the flour, pumpkin pie spice and baking soda and set aside. In a large bowl beat the butter and brown sugar together. Mix in the pumpkin, eggs and vanilla. Slowly add the flour mixture. Finally, mix in the white chocolate chips. Drop by spoonfuls onto a baking sheet (sprayed with non-stick cooking spray). Bake for 20-25 minutes. Makes 4 dozen.
here the boards are once I laid them down on the floor at the studio:
The character sketches of the four girls are detailed and intimate and yet, at the end of the book, none of them feels like a 'best friend', for despite the tiny details - how they dressed, their family lives, their thoughts, dreams and so on - one really doesn't get to "know" them well. For that matter, even though the girls live togther, they are strangers even to each other until one tragic event brings them together.
He is Isagani’s godfather and a priest.
This is the only ramen I order at Ippudo and it never fails to hit the spot. We also always, ALWAYS order a side of gyoza to go along and that, my friends, is my idea of a belly happy meal.
The duo is currently on a worldwide tour with Elton John and performing on solo dates as well. They are preparing to record their second album which will come out in Fall 2012.
My computer crashed this week, and I lost most of the interesting and well-written articles I had pulled for all you lovely readers this week. I included below the ones I could recover, but I’m afraid the list is a little short this week. To compensate, share your favorite conversation-starter article from this past week in the comment boxes and include the link so we can all benefit and stay informed together.
Maybe a hologrammed Audrey Hepburn, perched waifishly in her Breakfast at Tiffany's window,
The family were my landlords, it was their building. They were entirely accustomed to having foreigners come and go, they just asked that I be in before 11 or so.
My far away friend and I exchange emails from time to time, something we have done for many years since we were 15 years old. The only difference is, back then we were mailing letters. We had a ten-year gap but when we reunited, it was like clock work; everything fell back in place, as if we never lost touch.
Went to a book fair yesterday...met Ally Carter...but you're not interested in that, I bet! =P
I have lived on three different continents.
1 century--
The 11th Formers close the ceremony with a Waltz that they practiced for weeks, and then a closing good-bye poem and song for the teachers. I even got an English shout-out from one of my favorite students, Tonya!
I wont post pictures of the other artists sections because it's really not my place to display their art work without permission but I was particularly in love with Reetta's work, she had an Animation Background up and some nice life drawing, Margot had some magnificent textural paintings up. I just adore them! Diane has some phenomenal classic looking paintings with a nice modern twist to them. She's really a magnificent artist! Maria's Work I've always been in love with and I got to see some new pieces from her. Varian Had a neat little sculpture of himself pushing a frame off the wall. It was awesome! I was really impressed with everyone's work.
Citing American historian Philip Jenkins, one archbishop said there has not been an Archbishop of Canterbury worth killing since 1645.
For those who don't know, All-Star mode is where you play as a character and must fight the entire roster of fighters in SSBB. Whatever damage that was inflicted on you stays throughout the entire thing, and one death = game over/use a continue. You do get three hearts which will restore you to full that you can choose when to use them or not. I did use them all, but was able to spread them out pretty well.
I think it's indicative of the times: in the 70s, everything was oriented towards the Boomers - kids were a footnote. There was an openness towards things considered solidly inappropriate today, and cinemas were full of adult oriented flicks, and precious little stuff for the kiddos. Look at the big budget movies for kids these days and compare them to pre-Star Wars kiddie flicks like the Herbie and Benji movies and Escape to Witch Mountain (1975). They were were few and far between, and quite often total shite.
I started by repairing the split in the bentwood. I used wood glue, c-clamps, and a piece of an old t-shirt. I used Gorilla brand wood glue, not regular Gorilla Glue.
So it’s not surprising that whenever possible there has been a cat in my household… so when this piece of software in need of a platform had developed an interesting character, which I realised it had certain cat-like attitudes, the answer was obvious. A robo-cat!
Your trucks, websites, businesses cards, appearance, and basically anything a customer sees in relation to your business will affect the perception they have of you and your company. Are you putting booties on before you walk in their house? Are you introducing yourself and taking the time to answer any questions the homeowner might have? Are you providing quotes on company letterhead? Do you thoroughly explain what your recommendation is and how it would benefit the customer?
they are not calloused like my
Before VBS, we spent some time doing visitation in a neighborhood area called the Bogue. Cletis and Tammy will be starting Bay Life Baptist Church in this area so our team talked to the community. We had survey questions such as 'Do you attened a local church regularly?', What is the biggest need facing Jamaica right now?, and 'How can a person know they will go to heaven when they die?'. The first 4 questions of the survey helps us know where the community is at as far as their involvement in a local church . The last question (about going to heaven) is where we spent most of our time when we talked to them. We split up into 4 teams and every team was able to clearly share the gospel, leave tracts, and get contact information for a follow-up visit. No one received Christ, but the gospel was preached. It was also good for our students get out of their comfort zones and share the gospel like this. When the video for Wednesday is up, you will notice very little visitation footage. A lot of Jamaicans don't like to be on camera so I didn't want to disrupt any conversations with the use of my camera.
It occurred to me that since the 1950s/60s people have had a box in their front room that has, in many cases, for hours every day, influenced the way people think and behave. It has indoctrinated them evening after evening. It is the media, particularly television, that has precipitated the social revolution. It simply would not have been possible without it.
Sometimes I sit and look at my children and try to figure out where they are in their attachments.
Scott Nicholson – Haunted Computer Books
DH is also building a gazebo, something I have always dreamed of having, but the two weeks vacation he took has been just unbearably hot and humid to do any kind of outside work. We are hoping for some nice fresh summer days to get out and do some more work.
and that for good - upon my soul.
In spite of my understandable caution, I was very rapidly reassured by this brew.
The cysts are usually unnoticed, but sometimes when I have sex I get pelvic pain and I assume (but don't know) its from cysts. The weight has been incredibly hard to lose (much like a diabetic- who will tell you that losing weight with your insulin all over the place is no normal task).
I don’t really know how to describe the feeling of meeting, getting to know, and getting to coach a group of people who, while they are from an entirely different continent, have a unified desire to perform as well as humanly possible. I simply cannot believe that the tiny gym I opened over 5 years ago, which at numerous points felt like an utter failure, has afforded me the opportunity to do what I got to do today.
What of the monks? What of them? Here is a robe, it is orange, it is yours. Keep it.
Steve Martin (All of Me, The Lonely Guy)
with colour
Occasionally the motion slowed.
“Y, you… kill all of them?”After several times being too shock to say anything, Junsu ask Yoochun.
2010.09.18 Afghanistan Sharsharak 3 4 Children are the casualties of a vicious bombing by Islamic fundamentalists.
When my Grandfather returned from exile, he brought me a Teddy Bear from London. I looked at the Teddy and instantly knew this was the Tokoloshe I always wanted to meet. So my bear got named Tokoloshe. I got smacked a few times because I would jump on my Grandmother when she takes her afternoon nap and scare her with Tokoloshe.
While Hands On Originals has declined to speak about the situation, the company did release a statement to the Herald-Leader. In it, while stating that the business does, indeed, employ and do business with people of all stripes, the business owners also made it clear that endorsing a cause they disagreed with was not something they were willing to do.
The Tea pot and the 2 Tea and Toast sets are what she gifted to me along with French Vanilla Tea, Chocolate Chip Dipping Cookies, Strawberry Jam and the Adele 21 CD ( which I LOVE)!!
Singh, who is in charge of financial inclusion and strategic planning in UIDAI, says: “Give us that much credit. We have a system in place.
2 paddles
“Nothing's gonna change the things that you said
“Risotto” of Spelt and Lentil with Roasted Cauliflower
Remember to try soon, as some may be pulled fast, and if I find a sample or goodies is gone, I do try the link early again the next day, as some are reloaded.
All you have to do is leave a comment on this blog to be entered. Comments will be open until 9:00pm EST on Friday 5/18. I will choose a winner using random.org and post it here.
Opened up my mail and what did i see?...It cant be true!...Really?!...You gotta be kidding me.
Thank you to the Pleiadian High Council.
That wasn't true. Josh had no clue that I had contacted a few of his closest friends (whom he has been friends with since grade school!) and that we were all planning a surprise lunch for him :)
There were about 30 dogs boarding there at the time, but only half of them left their kennels, according to a clinic employee.
It has come to my attention (like running into a brick wall) that I need to work at short stories. I simply cannot write a short story.
‘But Dave why do you use paint anyway? Why not show the beauty of the natural wood as God intended?’ Well, I did think of leaving the wood grain showing, but when the sculpture was more or less finished the look of the grain detracted from the form of the thing, I was a bit disappointed by it – it really does look much better black – I assure you!
The only wish some readers might have for this story is more of a history on the Seekers, a motley group not without their share of supernatural talents who vehemently oppose the teachings of the False Prophet. We’re not sure if they’re a group we can trust or if they are simply the lesser of two evils in a city overrun with those positively ravenous for power, and while that adds to our anxiety in a good way while reading, by the time we reach the end we can’t help but want a few more chapters to help us know them better. Overall, Struck is a fresh story with a solid group of characters, and Ms. Bosworth is an author who has more than caught my attention.
Freigeist Bierkultur have an interesting range of beers, all brewed at the Helios Braustelle in Cologne, hosts of the Festival der Bierkulturen. Their Deutscher Porter is no exception, at least from the description. The ingredients include salt, and brettanomyces is involved in the fermentation process. Pouring an opaque black, with just the faintest traces of ruby highlights around the edges, this 8% ABV porter hints at soft vanilla toffee, light coffee, licks of licorice and a squeeze of soft summer fruits on the nose. All quite toned down, but there nonetheless. So it was quite a kick in the teeth when the first mouthful delivered not a rich, full-bodied, fruity, chocolatey porter, but a bite of a lemon. It's sour. Not Cantillon sour, but significantly so nonetheless. It's refreshing. The expected roasty or chocolate flavours are playing sixth fiddle somewhere, but the fruits, raspberry and green apples perhaps, creep out from under the lemon to leave a pleasing tartness on the tongue. A slight oiliness at the back of the throat may come from the salt, but it's hard to say where that comes in to play.
The United Methodist Church’s doctrinal standards maintain classic Reformation understandings of justification by grace through faith.
Sea Cottage Tidings,
First of all last week the Salone Internazionale del Mobile was held in Milan, the yearly international furniture and design fair that attracts droves of people from all over the world. The main event takes place in the Fiera outside of the city, but for years now the event has started spreading into the city. For a week the town is alive with a buzz, even more so than during the fashion weeks. Every other building host exhibits, installments or events until late into the evening that are often open to the public. It is customary to walk around town and look at what is happening in the world of design, visiting everything from the showrooms of the best known brands to collective exhibits of young, up-and-coming designers and students with their alternative take on living spaces and objects. Music plays, crowds bustle in and out of courtyards following the banners that indicate spaces dedicated to the Fuori Salone (literally Outside of the Fair), which display bizarre creations and lights to attract people like moths.
OPI's French Quarter for your Thoughts - REAL GRAY!!! I thought it would be a dead hand kind of colour on my, but it actually compliments my skin tone quite a bit. I love this colour so much!!! It is also a really easy to wear colour and goes with just about everything. OPI's Ginger Bells is another favorite of mine, but it clashes with a lot of clothes. Run and grab it while it's still out!!!
Chrysanthemums
at the going down of the sun and in the morning,
This thing was HUGE. Even discounting the tail which easily longer than it's body. I know there are rats in the garden and that they come out in the night and my cats have occasionally even killed some and left them for me on the lawn, but never this big. I haven't even ever seen a rat this big before. It was easily half Hermione's size and she brought him in her mouth all the way through the cat flap and to the other side of the house. I've chased her out of the cat flap with the catch plenty of times before, she KNOWS she is not supposed to bring them in, but I guess this one was just too heavy to hang on to. When she finally killed it and I picked it up (in yellow Marigold gloves) from behind the wood basket, she tried to bat at it and have it run off so she could chase it again. That's another thing, I'm never playing chase the furry toy with her ever again. It gives her ideas far beyond my tolerance level.
That Makes One Of Us
6 eggs, separated
Timothy moved from Cloverdale to Tamworth on Tide eight years ago seeking better opportunities. The move was nearly catastrophic for Mrs. Tildon. Timothy is her only child and has been her rock and foundation ever since Mr. Tildon died ten years ago. Timothy begged her to move but Mrs. Tildon tearfully declined. Her life is sewn into the fabric of Cloverdale. The Clover Valley has been her home since birth and leaving it and her friends behind would be too much to ask from someone her age.
So obvious, in fact, were the defects of the scheme that a year before, in September 2008, The Guardian, while acknowledging the "brilliant courage and ingenuity" of the British, dismissed it as a "glorious but dangerous folly".
I learnt a lot writing this book and it was tough work living up to the challenge I set myself. I think a lot of things about plot and action crystallized for me during the writing of this novel and I hope that readers will get the benefit of that. I'm excited to see what people think of the new book.
It was tough work. Your situation with foster care was HARD! There were many people wanting the best for you, and some that worked against that. There were too many ups and downs to even remember off the top of my head. The only thing that was consistent was that WE LOVED YOU NO MATTER WHAT!!!!
When we had Henry join our family, I could not stop thinking about the blessings of eternal families.
"I was going to volunteer, and they said that I could get tickets to see the Red Hot Chili Peppers, so I said, 'What the heck?"' Cowell said. "I've never seen the Red Hot Chili Peppers. I've heard of them, but I never heard them."
The Senate version of the budget does include a modest $8 million cut to the Pennsylvania Higher Education Assistance Agency (PHEAA).
Other children’s books ignore.
I was a bit disturbed that it was photographed backwards for the magazine, the wood showing on the opposite side, but I guess it could really be worn either way- it's birch wood so beautiful on either side.
Initially I had reservations about posting this on my blog. I worried about offending my non-Christian readers. However, then I realized… In following MY Christian Faith, I can’t be afraid about offending my Christian readers. I need to share my beliefs, and hope that my message will touch someone who needs to be brought closer to, and hopefully into a relationship with, Jesus.
Good morning y'all! I hope this post finds you well and happy from a nice weekend. I basked in the glory of a beautiful spring weekend and I couldn't have asked for more. Friday night we had dinner and hung out with a few of Stephen's friends, which was a nice change getting out of the house after recovering from my cold/whatever that was from last week. Even though I felt much better after last weekend, it seemed to drag on forever! Oh and I bought these napkins Friday...don't you love them?
And maybe for this there were those who tried to eliminate him in October 1995, blowing up the car that carried his in the centre of the town of Skopje, in a dark assassination attempt that remains unsolved.
I have a new art journal page to share with you today. I've been trying to keep up with my 2 minute sketches--the idea is to do one a day, everyday with no real goal in mind. Normally I just sketch on whatever piece of paper happens to be in-front of me, but lately, I've been looking at them thinking its silly not to include some in my journal, so I've been trying to do my sketches on better paper...
And how could you not mark the end of An Officer and a Gentleman as one of the greatest endings to a movie ever? Seriously... after everything that happened in that movie - I didn't see the ending coming at all.... I could not shake that one out of my head for weeks!
College has declared only one holiday that is 8th itself but we want one week off ! So its rest time but yeah not only rest we will also revise all the topics we studied this month because we really did not had time to revise because of the so called tiring schedule.Its all because new rules have been declared in our college and the rules are just like hell !!! :p
Me: (LMFAO) Ummm you’re not talking to me anymore?
Fewer international catastrophes and improving non-catastrophe personal-lines results also contributed to overall profitability, says Long.
Alberto Giacometti: Number of his works that sold for over $20 million last week in New York: 3.
Spectrum Pharmaceuticals, Inc. 21
I used a Spellbinder die to make this frame. I also sponged with the the same ink as the flower. No extra bling on this one. Did you get inspired to start your Mother's Day cards?? It's coming sooner than you think!!
I remember a nurse looked at me seriously and asked if it was planned....I said "Planned? She's 77 years old! It's a miracle!" A sort of disturbing horrible miracle.
Memory- my baptism
In honor of PEOPLE LIKE US and Brothers and Sisters Day, Disney has provided a fun quiz to see how well you know your brother or sister. If you take the quiz, be sure to let me know in the comments how well you did!
kissed by foam and salt and breath of night.
The following points must be addressed and prioritized in order that people will go away with a positive feeling and will shout the praises of Brasov to the world;
My uncle owns 4 laundry mats in the town i live in. It is a very small town. I am positive he makes more then 25 to 40 grand annually. If you want to build a new one you could save thousands in the long run if you knew how to do electrian work and plumbing. I am not sure his exact figure but I can give you an idea how good a life you will have if it is a succesful laundry mat business. He lives on the lake in an over 1million $ house. He drives a Yukon just because he doesn't give a crap about cars. My cousin which is his daughter drives a new 2007 BMW. Recently he bought a brand new Mastercraft x30 paid in cash on the spot. So if you had a succesful one you could make alot of money."
Return with your fangs and your claws,
Sometimes, it's tough when people in my life misunderstand my cough. In high school, I had a teacher during my study hall who wouldn't quit telling me how awful my cough sounded each day in study hall. One day, he brought in cough drops and told me to eat them because my cough was so annoying. He didn't know I had CF, and I was too infuriated and embarrassed by that point to tell him. So I packed up my things and just walked out of the class. Looking back, I wish I could have been stronger and just told him that cough drops wouldn't cure the genetic illness that was causing me to cough. But instead, I roamed the halls, teary eyed, for the rest of the class period hoping that maybe some day, more people will know about CF, and may think, some people have coughs... just like some people have a limp, or a wheelchair, or glasses. Or maybe someday, with a lot of hope, people with CF won't have a cough, and we can go on living without disrupting anyone :)
Angie is feeling worse – Jim is feeling better. Angie is going to the doctor today…it seems like flu-like symptoms and is going around!
We Bought a Zoo, with a rating of PG, featured a preternaturally well-adjusted seven-year-old who was the voice of balance throughout, compared to her emotionally devastated father and brother. Whoever came up with the prank of using the word “dick” in a scene that had no foreshadowing, in a situation that held no humorous context, and by a character who would never have said it, needs to be fired.
Tonight, hubby and I are going to enjoy Military Appreciation Night at the hockey arena in a local community. It's always fun once you get there, but tempting to stay home when the weather is cold as it has suddenly become here in this great state.
but because it never forgot what it could do.
The X-Ray Man can see through walls with true aplomb and ease,
You see, the truth is, policy makers in the US are the lap dogs of Israeli politicians. And lap dogs always do their owner’s bidding.
The first of the five series is The Last Jihad. This book has indicated that the World Trade Center and the Pentagon had been bombed. Here’s the catch, the bombings happened in September 11, 2001 right? Mr. Rosenberg had started writing for Last Jihad on January 2001, this was few months before the 9/11 attacks! Quite interesting hah. As they described this fiction book–The book that started it all.
If you are curious as to what I have been up to this week for my website, Someplace In Thyme, just visit my business blog Someplace In Thyme2.
insert irritants into the nostrils, anus, or vagina. In the last
It does also allow me to do my job incredibly well! As I can fix anything from here. So it’s great for my job. But I don’t do anything about my emotional life from here.
*1 quart half and half (organic is great, but any half and half will do)
Thank you Dr. Mohler for “getting it done!”
P&G = Procter and Gamble insert
Third option, since I make my own all-natural soaps, lotions, and other bath and beauty products (www.southernheartsoaps.com)... a collection of some of my favorite products... three bars of soap... one honey oatmeal an all natural soap which contains real honey, real oatmeal, and is skin-loving and moisturizing... one Granny's Old-Fashioned Lye Soap which is exactly what it sounds like, a nostalgic tribute to days gone by, unscented, simple, moisturizing, and all natural... one Southern Cook's Coffee Soap... a soap made with real coffee and added coffee grounds that make a great exfoliant... coffee is odor absorbing so this soap is great for the kitchen to remove the odors of onions, fish, garlic, etc. from your hands (YES! it really works!)... also in this little set, I'm including a 6 ounce tube of Clarity Hand and Body Lotion made from avocado butter, cocoa butter, olive oil, with the essential oils of rosemary, lavender, geranium, lemongrass and peppermint which add skin-nourishing properties as well as mental clarity... and last but not least... a tube of peppermint lip balm made with honey, beeswax, olive oil and peppermint essential oil.
yaaaaaaaaaaaahhhooooo......
Remembers the frozen cherry yogurt. Lo-cal, no fat fun surprise! Happy, happy, happy. Sets out dessert dish, grabs spoon and tub of yogurt from freezer.
The Chinese should understand it's nothing personal just Paddy buying some green votes.
The Boswells came to be well known locally while still in their early teens, making appearances in New Orleans theaters and radio. They made their first recordings for Victor Records in 1925, which included “Cryin’ Blues” where Connee is featured singing in the style of her early influence, the African American singer Mamie Smith. The Boswell Sisters became stage professionals that year when they were tapped to fill in for an act at New Orleans’ Orpheum Theatre. They received an invitation to come to Chicago and perform in 1928 and honed their act on the Western Vaudeville Circuit. When their tour ended they traveled to San Francisco. The hotel that had been recommended had a less than savory reputation, and the man at the desk suggested that these three young ladies might be better off in another hotel. That man, Harry Leedy, would later become their manager on a handshake and become a permanent part of Connee’s life.
Hello and welcome to the second post of Lawn Fawn's April inspiration week! We are just so excited about this week! We are featuring four stamp sets and our paper line Bright Side, and we will have fun posts and giveaways and lots of inspiration!
"We got three dachshunds, two birds, and a cowboy!"
FOUNDER OF THE E-WAKENING ACADEMY
OMG. THE WRITING STYLE IS AMAZING!!! But I won’t say anything else in this paragraph, because I will mention it lower down! But… It was just so sophisticated and elegant! JUST AMAZING! Nothing quite like it!
At 9:16 p.m., a 16-year-old boy was shot in the face near 63rd and Carpenter streets in Englewood, according to authorities. He was standing on a porch when he heard shots and felt pain, police said. He's in serious condition at Stroger hospital, according to the Chicago Fire Department. Police said his condition has stabilized.
LIMPOPO police have kept from court video footage showing the alleged assault of freelance journalist Chester Makana by ANC Youth League official Clifford Mohloana.
So what are you waiting for? Hold on tight to the unicorn’s mane, and I’ll whisk you magically over there right now…
There's a fair bit of plot too. Revolutionary slogans appear on the walls of the cemetery, the name of Bêche now a weapon of change; Baratte is attacked and almost killed in his bed; an act of violence in the cemetery threatens to be the catalyst to undo the entire project. So there's a lot going on but rather than feeling like a historical novel burdened with detail it actually reads more like a thriller. Those of a literary bent will find most satisfaction in the figure of Baratte himself rather than the plot and characters that surround him. The way in which he wrestles with his ideas of reason and progress, his battles with desire, loneliness and responsibility; the oppression that he feels from the authority figures around him and even 'his own weakness and confusion.' There is always something that clouds his thinking, makes it hard for him to reach any clear conclusions; the stench of the cemetery, the head injury after he is attacked and the 'word blindness' that afflicts him afterwards.
Thing is -“I AM HEALED”
Japanese is like one big metaphor. No, not like a metaphore for tentacle rape, but for other words. Like the word for 'today' is written with the characters for 'now' and 'day'. If you memorize just the meanings of Kanji, you can figure out what might be written, even if you can't pronounce it.
Jenene isn't an interior designer either but look at how talented she is!
Cheese-Rolling at Cooper's Hill Gloucester is held annually on Spring Bank Holiday Monday. The slope has a gradient that is in places 1-in-2 and in others 1-in-1, its surface is very rough and uneven and it is almost impossible to remain on foot for the descent. Injuries incurred are usually minor and competitors (particularly the successful ones) enter again year after year.
Corn custard: In a food processor, break in the eggs and add the corn, 1/2 tsp salt, 2 tsp sugar, a big pinch nutmeg. Process until the corn kernels are a rough puree. Add the cheese and give the mixture one or two pulses to combine.
I chatted to the young blonde polling officer in the library whilst I was casting my vote. It does make you wonder what benefits these people get to do such a thankless job: other than from dipping into the ballet box when no-one’s looking and changing all the UKIP votes to a proper party, obviously.
Person said...
I used some really pretty papers from Prima (fairy stack I think) and coloured this oh so sweet Lili stamp using Copics in co-ordinating colours. The lace edge is a Martha Stewart punch. Last but not least the wooden leaf embellishment I found at the craft barn on Sunday and could't resist buying several packs. They come as plain wooden shapes which you can ink or paint, very cute I think.
My knee-jerk instinctual thoughts regarding Mother’s Day go straight to my mom.
Labor Signs: I don't think so. Just some cramps here and there...but I don't know what that feels like yet.
Yes I did say that and now I am watching my street cred slide away!
Despite the fact that my mom’s recipe for pickled eggs called for two dozen, I was able to scale it down to a mere four (how many eggs can one girl eat, really?) and after filling my pantry with the ten or so spices necessary to make pickling spice (thanks to my new cookbook) and waiting two weeks for the brine to work its magic, I have enjoyed my first bite of Easter. A few days early but hey, it’s officially Easter weekend in my book, which is close enough.
I didn’t chip away at my comfort and maintain my professionalism
in no time the ladies came up with the most beautiful things
"We can't waste any time. Children will die if we don't do something about this now." Her knuckles turned white with her grip on the butter knife. She twisted her head. Her mouth a butterfly's breath away from his and her eyes not meeting his intense gaze. "I can't let any children die."
I'm not great at soppy romance scenes. I often want to skip them and get to the part where people die.
As a mere beer drinker with not much knowledge of the science of brewing, having a resource of this type at your fingertips is invaluable. Every day is now a learning day as I play the random page game with my Oxford Companion. Pick a number between 1 and 900, go to that page and learn heaps of new stuff about beer.
1 helped
Today, I held you for almost 45 minutes. You opened your eyes, those big blue eyes. You are so adorable, and placid, I cold hold you all day.
ROMNEY: …I have voted — I have always voted for a Republican any time there was a Republican on the ballot. With regards to the Speaker’s involvement in the Reagan years, he can speak for himself. The Reagan Diaries and the other histories that were written at that time can lay that out as well. I — I — I think, I think what he said speaks for itself and I’m proud of the things I was able to accomplish.
Gillan also discussed the return of Doctor Who in August, revealing new details about the mid-series premiere 'Let's Kill Hitler'.
I still like them and she'll wear these all summer, but maybe we'll go for less of a Louis XIV with the next pair.
Gary Direnfeld, MSW, RSW, is an expert on child development, parent-child relations, marital and family therapy, custody and access recommendations and social work. He is the author of Raising Kids Without Raising Cane, hosts a reality TV series “Newlywed, Nearly Dead” and is a columnist with the Hamilton Spectator on parenting matters. www.yoursocialworker.com
If last night didn’t convince me that this People’s Partnership govt is visionless and desperate, then nothing will.
Grease tin or ramekin with melted butter. Break eggs into a bowl and beat well. Add milk, flour and salt, and beat until just blended. Fill the tins 3/4 full with the batter and bake for 30 minutes without opening oven door. Serve hot with butter, jam, syrup or honey.
OK, how do we call this one? If I was an author and wanted to use an author solutions service – push me, and I think I would go for DellArte Press than say, Xlibris or AuthorHouse. But only because of what I know. Most authors visiting this paid-publishing service in the future will be oblivious to Harlequin, and perhaps, Harlequin will also be oblivious to them. It will be interesting to see how many are fed into DellArte Press through the Harlequin slush pile.
This is such a hilarious and beautiful story, about the resiliency and spirit that early adolescents have, in spite of things that always seem to go wrong.
Best Original Film Score
It would be easy, of course, to dismiss Melissa as nothing more than a silly 'ladette'. But it is hard to reconcile that stereotype with the young woman she is today, fresh out of university in London with a first-class English degree, the privately-educated daughter of financiers, and an aspiring writer.
The four year old, who needed sneakers, was wearing a Redskins football t-shirt. When he picked out the maroon and gold Ironman sneakers within seconds of entering the store and said “I’m done!”, I thought, this is the only outfit in the world that won’t look bad with those shoes.
This is from our first date.
What I used :
Info is power
Now you might be wondering, are ALL teens like this? No. But it’s like I’ve always done in any aspect of teaching. I can choose to focus on that one student who cusses like an upset coach and rolls her eyes twenty times in twenty minutes, or I can focus on the thirty other students who say thank you and are nice to each other and who are truly genuine caring human beings.
And here it is like a house that is merely walls
Seems there is no way to make a bunny mask that isn't the stuff of nightmares. I think we'll skip the mall this year and jellybeans will just magically appear without the furry freak.
I might not be able to make it up to Wildflower so we will have to see. However its FULL steam ahead for Ironman Coeur D Alene!!! Congrats to all finishers!
25. Letting her ride on your shoulders is pure magic. Do it now while you have a strong back and she’s still tiny.
I actually do think that the Lord Ruler will be defeated and Kelsier and his crew are just going to have to come up with a Plan B – quickly. But, the only reason I feel so confident about this is because of the name of the book ‘Final Empire’ which is probably a bit goofy of me but there it is!
The growing up of suburbs occupied solely by any individual class is bad, socially, economically, and aesthetically. It is due to the wholesale and thoughtless character of town development, and is quite foreign to the traditions of our country ; it results very often in bad municipal government and unfair distribution of the burdens of local taxation, misunder- standing and want of trust between different classes of people, and in the development and exaggeration of differences of habit and thought ; it leads, too, to a dreary monotony of effect, which is almost as depressing as it is ugly.
“If last year was a tsunami for the SNP, perhaps the tide is now going out on Salmond”.
Mr. March travels take him from Concord, Mass. to Virginia and on to Washington D.C. Brooks bases most of March's character on Louisa May Alcott's father, Bronson Alcott. The Alcott's lived in Concord near Ralph Waldo Emerson and Henry Thoreau. Alcott was a teacher who was a little ahead of his time. Brooks decision to model Mr. March after Mr. Alcott makes sense as Louisa May Alcott modeled Little Women after her family as well. I recognized Bronson Alcott as Mr. March right away because I read Eden's Outcasts, a biography of the Alcotts a few years ago.
Cause I'm not taking the easy way out
My little 2 year old had a fit, when I had to peel it away from his little fingers to take a picture.
It was LOVE.
The mother becomes obsessed with the video, the younger sister begins to imitate the sexual dancing that she sees all around her. Even the paragon of intelligent beauty that is Jake’s crush reveals her own thoughts about female sexuality and they’re far harsher than Jake’s rosy crush on her has led us to expect. It’ll make you think about what influences us today as women…and what the men in our lives expect from us as well.
Environment settings.
There are several other fairy tales and retellings I love, and many fairy tale retellings that I devoured and consider to be favorites.
Now not only is it "New Release Day" but it's challenge day to at JellyPark, this week's challenge is called "Winter Wonderland"- so show us those projects featuring snow/snowflakes! They are actually predicting a little dusting her in KCMO, which the kiddos will love as we haven't had hardly any snow this year!
The era before the Dinosaurs was fascinating, with all sorts of prototypes of what would become major animal phyla (well, plant phyla too, but I sadly lack the imagination required to be a paleobotanist). The Mammals descended from a strange group that was dominant at the time, the mammal-like reptiles. They dominated the end of the Paleozoic Era, the "Old Life" before the Dinosaurs of the Mesozoic.
(Pixinguinha)
Another wonderful thing is Mike and I have a LIFE COACH! Mike met him thru the KLAV AM radio show he did thru Preventive Pest Control and Matthew Cox with the Never Give Up Foundation helps parents with special needs children and helps us learn to advocate for what the children need...and already I know we'll be able to increase the therapy and help for Christie!!! I am bursting with excitement! It's worth every penny this will cost us...and good thing is it's not forever that I'll be needing him as a life coach...I am being guided to programs and knowledge that will bless our family forever!!
Amy Winehouse - Carling Academy, Newcastle-upon-Tyne, 18 November 2007
Please check the buyer reviews of Canon EOS Rebel T3i 18 MP CMOS Digital SLR Camera with EF-S 18-55mm IS II Lens Kit + Canon EF 75-300mm III Telephoto Zoom Lens + Canon Deluxe Gadget Bag + Canon LPE8 Spare Battery + LEXSpeed 32GB SDHC Class 10 Memory Card + Sunpak Heavy Duty Mon-Tripod! Willoughby’s Est. 1898 Double Lens Amateur Photographers Incentive Bundle in the merchant’s site by visit the link below.
My Thoughts: I found this searching the library catalogue for The Jane Austen Handbook. From the title alone, I needed to request the book and read it. It’s definitely academic analysis, though not overly dry, and since the subjects are Jane Austen and feminism (with some Mary Wollstonecraft context), I totally dug it.
Why I loved it: Intriguing. One has to read in between the lines, discover double meanings and think a whole lot while reading this book. It was disturbing but memorable and well thought out and written.
Distant view of the Fortress, showing the Third parallel under construction. The French have shifted their targeting to the Ravelin (the triangular outworks in front of the Bastion), and in response the Austrians have sent a sapper into the Ravelin to try to keep up with repairs. Meanwhile, as the siege drags on and the food supply gets lower and lower, the populace have become increasing restless; by the end of the siege, I have had to put down at least 2 popular rebellions, and have twice had my units on the walls attacked by angry mobs! Being the Governor of a besieged city isn't all fun and games, after all. Being the officer in charge of a siege isn't a life of luxury, either; by the end of the siege, Barry (playing the sans-culottes) will have had both his Commander and subordinate killed, as well as their first replacements! General Petrosic decides to head for another stein at the Prancing Pony. By this point in the siege, though, the beer is definitely strongly resembling Horse p***... if it isn't largely composed of it in actual fact, which it may well be!
Although we are far away you and your family are always in our thoughts.
For four of the people here, they come home one day and the sink is magically empty, ready for more victims of ramen and hot pockets. For me, I am the one cleaning mold off week old plates. I’m not really acting like everyone’s bitch, it’s just that I like doing dishes. It’s kind of calming in the storm of tests, zombie killing, and drunk girls. Plus my mom inadvertently trained me to like doing them a certain way, and I can’t say all the other people here would do them to my standards. Or at all.
Parallel structure, please. Yes, even normal people maintain parallel structure when talking casually. It just feels more natural that way.
Bottom line: Just because I want to get married does not mean I should settle or give up on my dreams.
- I stirred a mixture of golden and dark raisins into my batter.
“Yes”…………….
We saw the “painted lady” houses, made famous by Full House (secretly, I never liked that show).
A friend commented she would get cheaper brands (and not biscuits), to get better value, but I suspect she didnt grow up with jumbo boxes of Weetbix (blah!) and bags of farmbake biscuits.
I got to the fifth store, again finding no Great Value canned carrots on the shelf, so I flagged down a manager and asked if they could tell if there were any carrots back in the stockroom. He checked his computer and said that while they were out of the carrots at this store, another store in the next town (a store I had previously not known about) had 63 cans of carrots in stock — but they were not a 24-hour store, didn’t open until 7 a.m., and in fact had to close early the previous evening because a semi had hit a major power line and knocked out power at the store. The fact that there were 63 cans of carrots SOMEWHERE did me absolutely no good because there was no way to obtain them at that time.
out there..
I was writing down silly observations and ideas, like:
If your blog post is dated before the publish date of the challenge then this is backlinking and your entry will be deleted.
3 c. sweetened condensed milk ( I bought two 14 oz. cans and used all of it, figured why not use that little bit that was left…)
When I asked the manager about the origins of Bistecca alla Fiorentina and of it being a specific breed of Italian bovine, he shook his head and said that no, he didn’t think so. Damn. I had hoped—just a little.
Every day i am there i learn something new about someone and i watch over them like a mother watching every one of her kids to make sure they are okay. Hours and moments can change drastically when looking after special needs animals.
–designed to play with other people: you don’t have to worry about kill stealing or ninjaing, about being the wrong faction, the wrong class, the wrong race (at about level 3 you can insta-port to any other starter zone), the wrong level (sidekicking), the wrong guild, the wrong server.”, “turn other players into allies rather than competitors”
2. Soft Drake. This is sort of categorical, but even if you don’t have the Photoshop chops to whip up one of these concoctions, it’s still a meme just to make fun of Drake’s softness. The undisputed heavyweight king of uppercuts to the dome of Drake’s manliness is Big Ghost. He is Drake's worst blog nightmare.
Son başvuru: 6 Ağustos 2012
The announcements of nominees came out this morning for the 84th Academy Awards. My preferences, just to let you know, are no preferences; I haven’t seen a one of these, not even the Best Picture category, which is nine films long this year. So why am I talking about the Oscars? Because it’s time for the the 2012 Oscar Fashion Photo Contest at Around the Grid!
It may look simple, but there were actually a lot of consideration going on to make this cake happens. Since this is my first time making an ice cream cake, I wouldn't know if the ice cream would be able to stand on it's own if I put it around the cake, would it melt under California heat, how do I decorate ice cream cake? The last question might be the most challenging one, I am so used to use fruits to decorate cakes, especially in the summer but I don't want the cake to be frozen if I decorate with it. Chocolate would be a good thing to use but again, it is so hard to work with chocolate during summer, unless you have a temperature-controlled kitchen. I did use white chocolate to decorate the sides, which was pretty messy too, but I've always wanted to brush something on chocolate and I'm loving the look of it.
Hm
I like this brewery more and more with every new title I try. Every beer of theirs is excellent, but somehow every new one seems to outdo the last.
I know, who needs one of those right? Well we did!
An interesting point is that while there are widespread protests against the animal “sacrifice” for Gadhimai, the slaughter of goats, sheep and turkeys by people of other religions is considered very civilized. And while the “Hindu Custom” of animal sacrifice is covered on BBC.. the Hindu-Vaishnava custom of fasting on that day is completely ignored.
The Chinese Astrology system divides us all into animals, 12 to be exact – Rat, Ox, Tiger, Rabbit, Dragon, Snake, Horse, Goat, Monkey, Rooster, Dog, and the Pig.
1) US Soldier Active Duty Iraq
The Viking's mother: Yes, of course you'll terminate if the baby's not healthy.
Total time: 1 hour, 20 minutes
2) Spring is here! Finally, spring has sprung...it was a balmy 75-80 degrees today.
Like the beginning when stepping into eden
Wanjeck, C. (2 February, 2012). Sugars should be regulated as a toxin, researchers say. LiveScience.com. Retrieved from http://news.yahoo.com/sugar-regulated-toxin-researchers-180605186.html
From the festival stages of The Big Chill, Glastonbury, and Roskilde, super smooth clubs in Europe and Japan, hard core road trips around the USA and Australia, tiny Muscovite basement sessions and Puerto Rican Candela sweat boxes, where there's the music love Quantic will go. Literally, where there's a Will, there's a way.Recent releases have been The 'One Offs, Remixes, and B Sides' collection on Tru Thoughts, his limited edition collection of rumba, plena, and cumbia music 'Mofongo Para El Alma' , and the Quantic album'An Announcement To Answer'.
Pinch their fingers in the doohinkies that hold the Mass books
By the way, this blog is about a picture, so here’s that picture:
Cream of tomato soup seasoned with dried orange peel, crushed garlic, smoked paprika and topped with shredded kale. Hummus sandwich with Nayonaise, sliced cherry tomatoes, hot banana peppers and shredded kale on 12-grain bread.
Finding the hotel was amazingly easy. I pulled up to the front office and two cars joined me. One pulled up to my bumper and one to my fender. Seeing as how there was no way I was leaving anytime soon I let them check in first. Hoping they’d move their cars so I could get out. Homeboy in front SCARED ME! Scared little white nerd at the front desk too. He wanted to pay in cash but not put down the deposit. White nerd insisted he follow the rules even giving him 10% discount an dropping the deposit by 50%. Well very scary homeboy left very angry. I moved to the counter and quickly bonded with white nerd. I love him! While finishing up scary homeboy walks back in. WN (white nerd) quickly gets my back and whispers my room number to me and points the way.
And fail sometimes
**update at 6 something, after some coffees: small adjustments made, burner works perfectly :) (this woman kicks AZZ) AND I gave her a scratch ticket and she won TEN DOLLARS. Wow.
1. Identify the problem the POV character has going forward from this scene.
Global domination through procreation; this could be the solution Afro/Black-supremists have been looking for because Global Apartheid, like Apartheid South Africa, can only be beaten by barricading the ballot-box with your bullocks.
The weather was soooo cold, all that there was to do was go in the arcades! Which was sooooo expensive! I gave each of the lads £20 each day, then Dan would run out of money..and would want me to ‘help’ him win something…lol I spent more than £100 a day while we were there…it was the most coldest, most expensive holiday ever. Dan was really sick the whole time too…but ya know, i wouldnt change a single thing…just seeing theses photos brought all the memories of the holiday back….and it made me smile. All memories are precious…even the not so ggod ones.
Nod your head
“Thanks, man.” Kenny handed Russell the file. “You got about thirty minutes to get an overview.”
After it was all said and done, the gremlins hit. Those little malevolent, mischievous little buggers erased the whole chat somehow! I searched help sections for a few hours, looking for any way I could retrieve our interview. I was aghast to learn that the only chats that are saved are ones from the gmail main page. Then why did it tell me that the pop-ins were off the record? The whole chat was off the record, sheesh!
By ROGER ALFORD — Associated Press
-white bread sandwich for easier digestion - whole grains are so important usually, but when you're sick, don't make things harder on your digestive system
The reason I ask is that I’ve come to collect certain books from authors I enjoy and have considered cracking those books (those ones that contain the author’s signature) and reading them. Yet every time I have those thoughts, a voice inside grips me by the collar and screams, “NO! You can’t! It’s sacrilege!” And I tend to agree with that voice. If I have a copy of a book that an author wrote with the author’s signature on it, it’s now much more valuable. It’s sort of like if Paul McCartney signed your copy of Abbey Road. Would you still put that disc in your car’s cd player?
At SPN’s annual conference in Cleveland last year, held two months before the midterm elections, the think tank network adopted a new push for education reform, specifically embracing online technology and expanding vouchers. Patrick opened the event and led a session about virtual schools with Anthony Kim, president of the virtual-school business Education Elements.
Smoked Sausage: For the sausage, I heated my girl pan to medium heat and cut the sausage length-wise and then into 1 inch pieces. I put them on the grill pan, stirring often, until they were heated all the way through.
Whew, mirror is clear, but now you can see the dirty dishes and strawberry hulls in the sink. And the oil rubbed bronze knob I was trying out on the upper cupboards. Can't win.
no camera lens could frame. I took the sown
Sassy is still lovin' her bunnies. She asked me to take this picture of her with a few she had tucked into her little box.
My son inherited his love for cheesecake from his father and my daughter is becoming more game and will happily devour a piece of plain homebrand frozen cheesecake from the supermarket. This was the extent of the cheesecake eating in this house. A $2.99 homebrand frozen cheesecake from the supermarket.
I’ve been a bit negligent lately, not backing up my files as often as I should. If there’s one thing about a scare…it serves as a timely reminder, so everything is in order again although we are still awaiting the verdict on Rod’s laptop.
As I get things together (including downloading the first digital pictures taken on a rainy walk through the Tuileries), let me share one one thing that might be of interest: How does a chic Parisian dress during rainy, windy, chilly days? Well, my eagle eye (that's a laugh) comes up with this:
A true Gryffindor, determined that he would join the fight,
You know on the plane I had to get started on something conducive to good travel!
Even without a full album out in stores yet, the band has already played shows all around Europe and the US, and has been remixed by legends like DJ Mehdi, Crookers, Mano & DJ Klever. The band has been asked to tour with Brit MC sensation, M.I.A, and have played alongside bands such as Chromeo and Does It Offend You, Yeah? And with more live shows, the long-awaited debut album and even a clothing line on the way, you can bet your ass that Steed Lord are unstoppable.
3) Business and investment freedom. If you’re a US citizen, foreign banks don’t want to deal with you, foreign brokers don’t want to deal with you, and most foreign investors don’t even want to risk getting in bed with you.
Fifty-five years later, Whiting and her fourth husband, Jack Wrangler, honored Mercer with a musical tribute called “Dream,” which ran for 133 performances on Broadway.
Today, however, I was as resolved as I was yesterday. Twitter has brought me a whole slew of wonderful new Slimming World friends, who have given me great suggestions about various low-syn foods to include in my lifestyle change.
when he asked her to go see Santa Claus
Combine separately and add to dry ingredients:
OR when the cashier threw my holiday cookie in the bag and I just knew she broke it. And she did! Hard to see here, but it has a crack running all the way up the right side. And the bottom button is smashed. This was going to be a gift.
3.- Give A Damn - Produced by Domingo
Some people might think it peculiar that a little bit of hedge trimming could conjure any sadness. After all, it's only a few gnarly trees - overgrown bushes really. Didn't I read somewhere that it's good for certain species if the lanes are kept in order? And doesn't pruning make the trees more robust in the long run?
Delicious curry prepared with eggplant chunks and jackfruit seeds which is simmered in gingerlly oil and spiced up with a spice powder prepared along with some spices and raw peanuts, this curry tastes marvellous when served along with hot piping rasam with rice or else curd rice...Both eggplant and jackfruit seeds works out wonder together as curry and needless to say this curry is our recent family favourite...U can also enjoy this dish along with some white rice and papads or else as side dish with rotis,the choice is urs..
Some years ago, when Mrs Angry's children were very small, she was stricken with a horrible dose of food poisoning, and spent a day lying on the sofa, moaning, and foolishly leaving her infants to their own devices for longer than was normal, or advisable. After a while, she realised an ominous silence had descended on the house, and she got up to see what they were doing.
I invited local politicians to come over and do podcasts with me.
Mara Wilson (Mrs. Doubtfire)
RED: Is there anything else you’d like to share with our Operatives?
We just really believe in what U2rblessed represents, and wanted to shine a light on that good:)...
Top if off with big hair (thank you Aquanet), Maggie's make-up, and a piece of Alli's sparkly cape..
Confederate Killed 2,600-4,500 Wounded 12,800 Missing 5,250 Total 20,650-25,000*
The Eureka Optima 437AZ is a bagless upright vacuum which means that users are spared the hassle and expenses of replacing and throwing out disposable vacuum cleaner bags. In addition to this, the loop handle on the Eureka Optima 437AZ provide comfortable grip and because the machine can be adjusted in 13 different positions, the machine can be used by everybody in the house.
Me: "Chili sauce for dinner?"
spiteful and quivering.
Sri Lanka is a country of many traits. Some you take in with fondness and others with boiling blood and gritted teeth. I clearly remember my first visit here, and it gives me goose bumps. It was the ride from the airport which instilled this love hate feeling in me for this country. We had a fair amount of luggage on us so we had to take a big van and on the way home I managed to confuse the vehicle for a horse. The minute I got in and took my seat, my sense of security and brace positions were thrown out the open window. There are about twenty one million people in this country and it always amazes me why every single one of them feels like they are on a formula one track when on the road. At first it might get under your skin that everyone honks their horns like mad men at a carnival, but with time you get used to it. For a country with a multi religious and linguistic culture, most Sri Lankans are quite friendly, but it is not in their nature to give way to others, be it on the road or queuing at a supermarket checkout line.
their guns on their shoulders!
Let’s to to
I am roses products I use are:
to do with the other. Once the boat finally makes it to Guam, the family waits until it boards a plane for Florida, where it waits again, this time to be adopted by an American sponsor. Chosen at last by a car dealer from Alabama (who seeks to train Ha's brother, an engineer, in the art of car mechanics), the family moves again:
One example of incentives working in transit is Hasselt, Belgium, which is usually held up as a paragon of free public transit, but where it seems that the key was actually converting the government-sponsored inner ring road from an incentive to drive to a "Groene Boulevard" where buses and bikes have priority. However, in order to pass both free transit and the Groene Boulevard, their promoters had to convince the citizens of Hasselt that it was "their" town, their mobility plan, and their bus system. Getting to the levers is not easy, and neither is controlling them once you do.
For example, for years the answer to “Public schools are failing!” was “Public schools need more money!”
It is a wild day today. The trees are bending and crashing in the wind. We go to the feed merchants over a very swollen River Ure and River Cover - carrying vast tree trunks with them as they cascade downstream. Trees are down everywhere. Where one has fallen across the road someone has already been with a chain saw and sawn the trunk into pieces. All is piled neatly by the side of the road.
strong smells
The statement then skips to when the detainee was discovered.
You know those people that are just not ‘sweets’ people? They could have their pick of anything they want and they would chose a bag of chips and salsa? Those people that don’t really care for chocolate or candy? They would rather eat an appetizer at a restaurant than get a dessert?
Almond Butter
In fact I mentioned my fear of Search & Replace on twitter and I got several examples of Word disasters:
However, such teething troubles will no doubt be a thing of the past as the local population gets used to, and more experienced, with this new form of transport.
My grandmother had given me $100 to buy Sophie some Christmas gifts, but she didn't "need" much - besides a spot to store some of her toys, so I figured why not put the money towards these plus some supplies, and do something a little more creative with them?
We at HartalMSM salute the courage of Max Koh who dares to tell it as it is, and of the editors of The Edge Daily who dared to publish the piece.
The mountain climbing and rappelling scenes are reminiscent of Cliffhanger (favourite Stallone movie evarr) whilst the tense forest shootouts and chase scenes have a Deliverance heavy feel. There's even something about The Wicker Man to the film's local Scottish village. It's not a very original movie, but that makes it no less pretty to watch. It could have been Melissa George sitting on the side of a mountain for two hours and I still would have enjoyed this. Heck, I could sit and stare just at Melissa George's grazed knee and be perfectly content.
At this year's London Book Fair I was in the Random House area having a cup of tea with a Fleet Street obituary writer. She was in the middle of advising me to publish all my old Ritz interview tapes (the laundry list includes Sammy Davis, Jr, Cary Grant, Tony Curtis, Frank Zappa and Anthony Perkins who successfully persuaded me to come off sugar), when a man at the next door table got out a copy of Ritz. I immediately pounced on him, saying I used to write for the rag. It turned out he was a literary agent called Robert Smith, who represents ex-Ritz editor David Litchfield, incidentally the best editor I've ever had.
Sierra Nevada Double IPA
In one corner we have heavyweight champ, Express Men, who has woven shirts in a great assortment of colors that fit so well we had to mention it in a previous article. In the other corner we have Banana Republic’s new line of slim-fit stretch dress shirts that come in an assortment of colors and a fit that rivals Express.
“We are RYV, expect us to break the silence, whether in the streets or on the Internet,” it said, stressing that “silence is a crime.”
Voters and the press should demand all Austin mayoral and city council candidates address this question as we approach city elections in May. Notably, in recent years Austin PD has placed increasingly greater emphasis on marijuana enforcement, with the number of new pot cases increasing 69% from 2007 to 2010. One wonders, for what purpose? Does that really reflect the priorities City Council expects APD to be focused on?
You check out a suspicious noise and it's nothing (0)
“We haven’t slept together before? Oh ok. Would you like to change that?”
"I have to tell you that this state, as you know, has a very special place in my heart. As many of you know, my husband was born and raised here," she said. "Our family has the privilege of coming here--the burden of coming back here every year...And that's really one of the reasons I married Barack."
An awesome front door will be coming home with me next month, too.
A bakery in the Thai province of Ratchaburi (which is about 100km east of Bangkok) wanted to highlight the Buddhist principle that you shouldn't always believe what you see and they came up with this little delight ....
During the war years Carrie was at school. She lived on a farm called Darnish Farm, Keith. She went to college in Keith for a year from 1944-1945 for shorthand and typing. At the age of 20 she got married to Alexander “Sandy” . They lived on the Crown estate of Spey Bay and the farm was called Floods farm. Carrie has a drawing of it on her wall drawn by Colin Murphy.
Please contact us at challenges@easycraftprojects.net so we can organise your prize.
I look round and see that a ­second group, maybe 15 strong, has sneaked around the back and blocked the exit. We’re surrounded, then the chanting starts. “They’re saying they’re ­going to stab us with their spears and smash our skulls with their clubs,” the interpreter says.
“It’s a misconception that you need a heart to love,” Asher whispered into my hair.
Tonight I cooked and served up my most original recipe yet: Southwest Mac n Cheese.
Communist Party of Greece founded in 1918, is Greece’s oldest political party. It has historically played a major role on the Greek left. KKE holds to doctrinaire, Marxist-Leninist communism. It has ruled out working in a coalition with other left-wing parties.
peas);
Released 1979.
Tom Brady transferred to USC, allowing Matt Barkley to redshirt and, eventually, beat out the two-time Super Bowl MVP in fall camp of 2010.
I'll be nice to all the stupid people who annoy the crap out of me.......
Dr. Mark Mirabello is an American historian and author. Mirabello’s area of expertise is the ”outlaw” history on the ”frontiers and margins” of human civilization. He lectures on Alternative Religions and Cults, Secret Societies, Terrorism and Crime, Banned Books, Intellectual History, and other subjects.
Kelly then changes into a black crocheted swimming suit to take some photographs for her Halloween party invitation.
Worse still was what happened to the care homes provider Southern Cross, which came crashing down last spring. The company had been pieced together by a hard-headed U.S. equity firm called Blackstone, after it started buying up care homes across the country.
Here are your random numbers:20
Bale grimaces and suffers. His two previous Bat-performances were much more than that, especially when he wasn’t being outshined by all those elderly Oscar vets. The evidence for this installment is thus far concealed. Again, I trust all the meaty soliloquies and jump-cut brawls are being saved for the actual viewing experience.
It has everything to do with it! We do not see the connection because our minds have been indoctrinated to reject biblical truths as mere myths - so much so that we are not capable of recognizing who the followers of Cain are. Sadly, (and I don’t like saying this, but I will anyhow) a growing number of young Christians are unable to distinguish beween the spirit of error and the spirit of truth. In South Africa more than 80,000 babies per year are offered to Baal through legalised abortion, but yet the worldview is blind to this horror. The worldview would rather go out of its way to endorse and condone it, than reject it.
Drink and Draw
Every year the Texas Advertising program sends nearly 300 graduates out to change the world. As the year comes to a close, hear from some of TexasMedia’s top seniors as they prepare for their last round of finals, graduation, and life beyond the Forty Acres.
heathendom shall become converted. Let the blessed gospel of the Eternal
Waveriders I give you Beehoover; the righteous, mighty, and inventive two piece ensemble from Germany that is out to send your musical enjoyment scale into tilt territory. Analyzing my own listening history, it was a forgone conclusion that I would embrace this band with wide open arms. Honestly, I feel as if a focus group looked into my brain, checked off the musical elements necessary to excite me, and compiled several of them to produce Beehoover. Let’s break it down as simply as possible, shall we? Beehoover sounds like an aggressive version of Tool, with a splash of Primus, topped off with Clutch-like vocals. Don’t worry. I’ll wait for that last sentence to properly sink in before continuing. No…I completely understand. Trust me. I feel exactly the same way!
Convienence is a religion in America. We are slaves to it, do everything we can to experience it. Like a drug we crave it's presence in everything we do. We start to believe that it's the way life is supposed to be. Convienient. Built around our wants and needs. That others were put here to create it for us and no, I can't be inconvieneced to make it convienent for you. Uh, hello. It's easier FOR ME, to do it this way. Duh!
With the threat of a bloody conflict diminished, Mormon refugees began returning to their homes. Though tensions between the Mormons and the federal government continued for decades, the Utah War ended the dream of a Mormon state geographically and politically separated from nonbelievers. Henceforth, Utah Territory was clearly a part of the American union, and it was granted full statehood in 1896.
It’s been quite a week since coming back from my visit to Washington. It’s weird…I had to back up and delete the word “home” and replace it with “back from my visit” because it’s still odd for me to call Charleston “home.” I guess I’ve come to realize that “home” is where my life is right now.
Friday, February 10: The old Nizwa cemetery stretches out over 1km on either side of the road north of the city center. It contains thousands of graves dating back to the arrival of Islam. The gravestones themselves are simple and modest in the extreme, as Islamic tradition discourages the construction of elaborate funerary monuments.
I had picked my papers ahead of time from a My Mind's Eye paper pack in my stash and coordinated my coloring to match- much easier than coloring first, especially when one finds out the paper you have in mind is in storage-lol! I die cut some of the elements and used pre-cut pieces that came with the paper pack as accents. I felt like it needed a greeting tag hanging off the button/bow but I wasn't ready to commit to the sentiment until I had an intended recipient- I like to keep my options open for cards until I am ready to send them!
Deputy Minister of Basic Education Enver Surty said matric prelim exams, due to start in a fortnight, could be affected.
That was never a very good argument. Gaddafi has never treated the military well, because he feared a coup. In part, that explains why sections of the military placed themselves in the head of the rebellion in Benghazi – many of these same people have been developing relations with Imperialism for some considerable time. Moreover, the Egyptian military was much more powerful than Gaddafi's, but it was neutralised. Indeed, it had been not only neutralised but turned in Benghazi.
Yes I’ll write for what its worth, what its worth
Me: "I'm leaving now and will be there in a couple of minutes. Hang tight."
Another problem inherent in evictions is that the farmer must be subjected to a departmental investigation as to whether an eviction “will affect the constitutional rights of any affected person, including the rights of children, if any, to education”. (Section 9, Clause (3) (b). This Act’s raison d’etre is to facilitate long-term security of land tenure to a person who has resided on land as an occupier (even if he has not worked or does not work for the person who owns the land). The Act makes it extremely difficult to evict an occupier. The Act states unequivocally that this “situation” (where someone occupies land which is not his) is “in part the result of past discriminatory laws and practices”. This seems to refer to the fact that South African commercial farmers of European descent have “caused” the homelessness and rootlessness of many indigenous peoples and that this “past practice” gives those now without land a “right” to occupy land not theirs.
I will be showing ways of making the most out of your patterened papers.
This was more a social gathering than anything a couple days before the real race on Saturday. Excellent jog through giant redwoods and more traditional New Zealand forest on super soft trails before an outdoor screening of Unbreakable at the Redwoods Center.
So This week I'm going to mix 2 together!
“We can also have a situation where during an economic downturn, investors may suddenly decide to sue the arrangers and other parties that have money,” said another industry player.
As long as we allow people to frame the argument as being about woman's "reproductive health", we lose.
It’s not clear what will happen to servicers that miss the 60-day deadline.
At the time, I did not realize that I was about to test him to see what he was made of, but looking back it is clear as day!
Complete cover design is available from £150. Complex covers with several images or montages can cost up to £500.
21. Do you hide your food or eat in secret?
Somehow we managed to create an incredible feeling in these four walls – and not just for the kids but for all the adults who come here too. Once you walk in the door there’s an overwhelming sensation that this is where you want to stay. You feel warm all over. It’s a place where children immediately sense pure joy, their faces light up and they feel love, lots of love. They squeal with delight when they see their favorite characters on the wall, almost life-like enough to jump out of the enormous mural. After their reading time they are rounded up to wait for their name to be called to get their special packages of new pajamas and books chosen for each one of them. You can feel the tingling running through their little bodies. I’ve heard their squeals thousands of time but still today they go right to my heart and make it skip a beat.
So Mitt “doesn’t remember that specific incident.” Maybe it’s because his life was so full of such “pranks” that the haircut assault was just one in a long string of acts committed against others, and having no conscience he has dismissed it from his memory. As for lying about it, I understand why he wouldn’t come out and say, “I was an asshole, I admit it.” That would go against the holier-than-thou, purer-than-pure image Mitt tries to project of himself: family man, husband and father, businessman, ruthless when need be, but always aware of the bottom line. “I enjoy firing people,” he once said, to which he can now add, “I enjoy bullying people.”
Mitford series by Jan Karon--I've been jonesing for Mitford, might have to reread these sometime soon.
It's the part of me that, no matter what weight I am at, determines that my cheeks will always make me look like a chipmunk gearing up for the nut-free apocalypse.
“ Single non-renewable season tickets may not be adjacent and will not be assigned with your renewable season tickets
No more hiatus
On April 28th,2011 Phantom and Mandrake the Magician creator LEE FALK would have been 100 years old. To celebrate his centennial, the Scandinavian Chapter of the Lee Falk Memorial Bengali Explorers club (with worldwide assist) have put together a tribute book, entitled LEE FALK – STORYTELLER.
Professor Penrose, though he is the premier mathematician of this age, will not be able to prove the existence of a time before the Big Bang.
2 unlocked
My Aunt J (who is Maggie's Mom) is super special to me. I have lots of special Aunties... but Aunt J. has always had a super special place in my heart. My cousin Jessica (who is Maggie's older sister) was born with significant birth defects and special needs. I was blessed to be able to watch my Aunt J. raise my cousin Jessica into a beautiful young woman. I was blessed that this just became part of normal life- being with people with different abilities and disabilities. Jessica was a few years younger than me but I would have still considered her my peer. It was about the time that I had my first baby that I knew my Aunt J. was navigating letting go of being Jessica's constant caregiver and I knew how being a Mom felt and how difficult this must have been for her to be able to give Jessica independence when there was so much worry involved in the letting go process and life changing times for them both. I love remembering being a teenager and seeing my Aunt J. in public with Jessica and being so proud of her accomplishments and smiling when Jessica might have done something not so age appropriate and how she always has treated her every bit with high expectations...and Jessica has lived up to every one!
OK... so this was a whole new experience for me... I created a canvas for the wonderful Montessori Kindy 2 of my girls have gone to over the past few years. Jessie finished up with them this week, as she moves to a Pre-prep program at the kindy at the girls' school.
People everywhere were gathering; all walking towards the signs that promised “free food”, and following the arrows pointing them towards the waiting lines. We followed along with the crowd, as the guideline rails that had quickly been put in place
“£2 for 3 minutes. Machine’s inside.”
Craig T. Nelson – Steve Freeling
But those are the exceptions. There are 103 million blogs in existence and 175,000 new ones created every day, according to Technorati, a San Francisco company that tracks blogs and offers a blog search engine.
Nox has the most diverse art selection. The western fairy tales she portrays are fun and fresh with an asian twist (for instance, the beast out of ‘Beauty and the Beast’ is leopard instead of dog like). She ranges between some slightly cliched but well presented anime drawings and clear cut line illustrations. My favorite work in the book ‘Please Make Peace’ (Pg 13) combines the best of her style.
I actually looked pretty on Easter Day. Nice makeup. My hair behaved. My cheapo dress went perfectly with my heels and I had a pretty pedicure to match. The Girl looked pretty in her white sundress and pink shrug sweater. The boys all looked great - new polos, even. Hubby had a suit on. But do you think we got even ONE pic of this? No. Not even one.
We are accustomed to reading our source material as just that—sources to get us at something else. We read to mine information to suit our purposes. Our biblical text has been a particular victim of this kind of reading, one that isn’t helped at all by our chapter and verse divisions. These invasive ‘breaks’ make us think (subliminally) that each verse is a separate thought, and ignores the nature of the paragraph (as a complete idea). Most people, I find, struggle to read the text in context.
Only 3 more sleeps until we venture to our first
I think my dupe matches the picture you see on the Lime Crime website but not the colour in real life. I'll show you a side by side.
Do you want to know when I perform my best athletically? I do not perform my best when I am at my happiest or after a particularly motivating pep talk…. I notice that I do my best when I am pissed off about something or really stressed out. I guess that I funnel my negative energy to achieve athletic success???
Well, it is many years now since he passed away. I was not present in the last weeks of his life, but it seems he may have changed his mind about God and eternal life. I hope he did—I like to think of him at rest and at peace with God. Because that is really what God is talking about in Isaiah 57. In verses 15 and 19, we read:
Willy Wonka & The Chocolate Factory
You can have a fabulous night not because you have drinks on the terrace of Café Flore and watch Frédéric Beigbeder and other chic Left Bankers walk by. Or go to the Ellen von Unwerth launch party where there is even better people-watching and the champagne is free instead of 15 euros a glass.
I told her about Cady and how we have to do IVF and she was SOOO excited for me when I told her that we were planning on doing IVF again. She told me to absolutely not worry about missing time when we are ready to try again! I can make up being late for appointments and work from home when on bed rest after transfer and everything. Can I just tell you I feel so blessed and KNOW I made the right decision with which job offer I accepted. And I hate (as I know most of you do too!!!) being told everything happens for a reason, but in this instance I totally believe it is true.
We expressed that was not a consensus opinion at all; eventually, the silence rule was lifted, but X expressed that we should all be mindful of our noise levels – a reasonable and appreciated request.
to indulge in its sweetness
It is to question and to provoke you.
COMPULSORY OVERTIME VOLUME NUMBER 6 cassette tape (one of 'em homemade affairs y'know)
Stevens explained the drugs have an effect on parenting. “Parents that are addicted often push parenting aside and therefore leave the children to learn and fend for themselves. This neglecting parenting style produces a greater chance of the child becoming involved with the substance and not being able to see the error of their actions.”
Halfway through the Q & A at Monday's Manchester University sell-out debate between Martin Amis, Ed Husain and Maureen Freely on Literature and Terrorism, a questioner asked: 'Do you think we can get back to Literature?'
As a general rule, all worthwhile dinner arguments can be resolved by simple empirical tests after dessert. We sealed an eye chart inside a ziploc bag and put it at the bottom of a large tub of water. I immersed my head in the tub and opened my eyes, pen poised over a notepad, but was unable to discern even the largest of the letters, despite still having my glasses on.
There is a very intriguing sports story that is going on right now and it strikes close to my heart.
Brittany Rose
Hoerr’s Law rightly asserts that – ‘It is difficult to make an asymptomatic patient feel better.’
as a branch tapping your window -
For many of us the quiet of the library is a wonderful retreat from the stress and overload of the day. While the solitude is good at times, don't overlook the chance to make new friends, whether it be the librarian and his staff, at lectures, joining in the various classes, and becoming active in the local writer's critique group. Opportunities to meet your neighbors in a comfortable and welcoming setting is a wonderful way to get out their to spread your wings and be social.﻿
These cute ants are perfect for a guy card which I've created for your inspiration today. I had a blast coloring this image with Copic markers - they just bring a smile when I look at them enjoying themselves with those marshmallows! The papers are from My Mind's Eye "All Spice" collection in the perfect guy colors.
ADHD is also sometimes associated with a higher than average IQ. The reasons for this are unclear, but if you’ve ever taken an IQ test, you know that the questions measure your problem-solving abilities, as well as your capability to see beyond the obvious. Since individuals with ADHD excel at noticing everything and in making connections, they do well on these types of tests.
1 tsp minced fresh ginger
There will be two winners again this week - one prize as usual of FIVE digi's from the Delicious Doodles Shop, and a prize from our sponsor of : 5 single digis or 1 digi set of your choice!
The year is 2009. Nineteen-year-old Jackson Meyer is a normal guy… he’s in college, has a girlfriend… and he can travel back through time. But it’s not like the movies – nothing changes in the present after his jumps, there’s no space-time continuum issues or broken flux capacitors – it’s just harmless fun.
Heartland of America: Memorial Day at
It's past midnight, friends, and it feels like a perfectly ghoulish time for some good old-fashioned ghost stories. We have monsters, creeps, and spirits on the brain today due to earlier posts, so we might as well carry on with another voyage... to the Other Side.
1. The Food is SMOKIN'!
Adele and I sang into the darkening night, while I added a second coat. Cali licked herself clean and curled up a few feet away from me. The house was quiet. The only sounds left were the wind, the crickets, Adele and I, in stereo again for the first time in almost 3 years.
So, take out your camera or cellular phone and start sharing with the world what you see and feel in your daily life.
Replied the old lady, handing her a jar: “I didn’t want you to miss me!”
NOTE: I hope all of you on the East coast are safe and secure while Irene creates havoc. Thinking of all of you.
Matthew 7
I find the best way to serve tacos is in a taco assembly line. Put everything out and have people make their own.
coursing across the floor
- set the oven at 300F and cook in a water bath to 150F
In free practice for the Indian GP, we saw a violent fluttering of Felipe Massa’s front wing. This is a higher frequency movement than the flex we commonly see on front wings – in fact, the movement is enough to cause the endplates to hit the ground, sending up showers of sparks. Bearing in mind that the wing is around 75mm off the ground when the car is at rest, we can appreciate the amount of movement that’s occurring here.
Let me start off by saying that this is the first post that'll actually involve a bit of rambling.
No. I was born in a tiny fishing village a little north of Mitinya in the Westlands.
‘April is the cruellest month, breeding
Please check it out here, and keep revisiting Russell Brown for further updates that are in the pipeline for this ground breaking plug-in script gizmo!
...Sam has discovered the iPad. The little turkey knows how to unlock it and everything. We have a couple of little games loaded that he can play, and he totally knows how to open them without any help. One night this week, I was finishing supper so I was letting him play with it to keep himself occupied, and suddenly I heard Shawn's mom's voice. Sam had pulled up Facetime and successfully called her, all while I took a casserole out of the oven. He's also figured out how to take pictures. These are just 2 of the approximately 40 that Shawn discovered on it this week.
Independence Day, for me, has always been linked with my birthday (two days later). Growing up, it was always an almost painful day to get through - so much celebrating but still so long to go before presents and cake. And, on occasion, the cake had a 4th of July theme (you all know the strawberry/blueberry/cool whip cake I'm talking about!). As I watched fireworks in the evening, all I would be thinking was that it was only 36 more hours until MY day. As I get older, I don't have the same kind of anticipation for my birthday, especially as I have started wishing the numbers stayed the same or reversed. (And I know I'm not old, but I'm coming up on some scary birthdays.)
MAGICAL HORSES (Carlton, out of print.)
I'm all for supporting worthy projects and creative endeavors. Mystic and I have always had the same problem of having too many in our heads. But he has started a couple online Let's Plays that I want to see through, and I hope you do as well.
Then I found the compromise I was looking for. Fender’s budget Squier range has something called a “Vintage Modified Jazz Bass Fretless” (model number 032660). Not a poetic name, I grant you, but it’s still quite a bass. Here is a link to the product page: http://www.fender.com/en-GB/products/search.php/?partno=0326608500
10. Serve with custard or cream...
“It is not the first time that I have known such a thing to happen; and I think that I shall be able to save your son. But he is really in great danger. I have seen the shadow of death upon his face; and, if O-Kame returns but once again, he will never behold another sunrise. Whatever can be done for him must be done quickly. Say nothing of the matter to your son; but assemble the members of both families as soon as possible, and tell them to come to the temple without delay. For your son’s sake it will be necessary to open the grave of O-Kame.”
Sunday night we had our “Last Night Out” although we didn’t know it at the time. Dan hung out with some friends playing games and watching football while I hung out with some girlfriends, eating popcorn & talking. We wrapped things up and got home a little before midnight, somewhat late for us. I felt the need to clean up a few dishes before heading to bed. I’d been trying to keep things clean knowing that at anytime I could go into labor, but this was the first time I felt a burst of energy to do them… I guess it’s true that you get a burst of energy before going into labor.
When showing me how to play Angry Birds, Jeremy asked: "Are you good at knocking stuff over?"
Continue to have a great summer. BTW, go see Harry Potter, I saw it today on IMAX 3D and it was AWESOME!
But first thing’s first: If you’re even remotely familiar with some of Smith’s films, podcasts, books, and/or tweets, you probably know what’s coming — language! – so carry on. However, if you’re not familiar with any of the above and words like “dick” and “cum” horrify you, don’t read this book. Like…just don’t. Those words have a starring role (okay, maybe supporting role). You’ll hate it. In fact, the first three pages alone might make you keel over.
So, why am I sharing this? Seminary is a great place. There is so much brokenness, transformation, growing, learning, questioning, and kingdom building that takes place here. Quite often, though, I have heard people suggest that seminary can just be a time of "waiting" and allowing the Lord to prepare us for the places to which He will take us. (note: I am by no means attempting to equate seminary with Babylon) However, I believe there is more that He would ask of us. We are called to seek the welfare and peace of the places where we live.
This month has been super jam-packed busy! So busy in fact I had to take time off from real world working just to keep up with what's going on at home! And speaking of jam-packed, I even packed jam. Not just the mango rosemary jam I promised and never delivered but good ol' fashioned strawberry jam. I tested two recipes and came back with the one I liked the most! Oddly enough, that was not the country 'use lemons' recipe that you slow cook. The more delicious, thicker, pinker lovelier batch came from the back of the Jamsetta packet. Go figure! (If anybody can tell me where to get local pectin, please post!)
The fail-safe key turned by Desmond Hume: $11,000
Here is a life fact: I am an awesome poet. *single blink* Anyhow, RUDE…I came across a stack of odes I wrote to my different celebrity crushes. I thought I should share them with you. So please, put your fingertips together and snap for:
Once my children were born and old enough, my husband and I ventured further south in the Baja Peninsula and often camped on the beautiful sandy shores of Rosarito Beach. Youth in general takes little into account except the enjoyment of the moment, and we were no exceptions. Usually traveling with my husband’s brothers and their young families or girlfriends, we never stopped to consider the dangers of traveling in Baja but only the enchanting beauty of our destination.
You can hear the shark breathing a it watches Hugo and his co-stars frolic naked in the waves while it waits nearby... breathing. Guess it must be difficult on its lungs to have to be BREATHING UNDERWATER.
Mother Teresa was perhaps the best pro-life witness of our modern age and she didn't have any children of her own. But she displayed a profound love for all humanity: the poorest of the poor and those whom society cast aside as not worth our time or attention. But she was not pushover. She stood up to heads of state who wanted to use her for a photo op or political gain and reminded them that being Americans or being rich or being powerful didn't amount to beans if you promoted mothers killing their children as the law of the land.
This rural town is known around the world for its churches carved from the living rock, which play an important part in the history of rock-cut architecture. Though the dating of the churches is not well established, most are thought to have been built during the reign of Lalibela, namely during the 12th and 13th centuries. There are 13 churches, assembled in four groups:
The butterfly at the centre caught me up ... quite close to what we know here as a Mourning Cloak.
Maya-maya pa, ay lumabas na yung doctor.
And then there were the dog buddies, Spike and Chester. That’s the one cartoon I didn’t care for. Spike was a huge bulldog and a bully. Chester was a hyper Jack Russell type who jumped around Spike. He was always slapping poor little Chester. I really felt sorry for him.
The youngest one, Sarah, couldn’t ride on the bigger swings yet. She had to sit in the toddler seats, which always struck Vincent as resembling a giant rubber diaper. It was safer, anyhow. Unless Sarah could pull herself out of the seat, there was no danger of her falling. Angel on the other hand, flew like the wind and loved to swing to the point of danger. She was his girl.
"Frank Meyers' system was a seven day process that he would tend to right after work. He would come in the back door, put his lunch bucket on the sink, kiss his wife, then go to the basement for that day's part in the process. After FDR took office, an executive order was issued proclaiming that 3.2% beer was not intoxicating, therefore it did not fall under the restrictions in the 18th amendment. A date was set when this would take effect.
Overall, it was a great night. I had no idea that when I invited Chimpotle, Yeti and Weston over to try a sample bottle of Boulevard Rye on Rye along with a blind porter tasting that it would eventually turn into something like the Gents we did last week. Most of it wouldn't have happened without Chimpotle scheduling things, Yeti doing blind pours, McCoy getting us rooms at McCoy's, Paul A. Ner giving us someone to ridicule, Fancy Pants bringing great beers, J for documenting all the beers from that night, a couple of drivers etc. Gents night is about the best night of every month and next month's might be the best one yet. Stay tuned.
For yourselves, brethren, know our entrance in unto you, that it was not in vain: But even after that we had suffered before, and were shamefully entreated, as ye know, at Philippi, we were bold in our God to speak unto you the gospel of God with much contention. For our exhortation was not of deceit, nor of uncleanness, nor in guile: But as we were allowed of God to be put in trust with the gospel, even so we speak; not as pleasing men, but God, which trieth our hearts. For neither at any time used we flattering words, as ye know, nor a cloke of covetousness; God is witness: Nor of men sought we glory, neither of you, nor yet of others, when we might have been burdensome, as the apostles of Christ. But we were gentle among you, even as a nurse cherisheth her children: So being affectionately desirous of you, we were willing to have imparted unto you, not the gospel of God only, but also our own souls, because ye were dear unto us. For ye remember, brethren, our labour and travail: for labouring night and day, because we would not be chargeable unto any of you, we preached unto you the gospel of God. Ye are witnesses, and God also, how holily and justly and unblameably we behaved ourselves among you that believe: As ye know how we exhorted and comforted and charged every one of you, as a father doth his children, That ye would walk worthy of God, who hath called you unto his kingdom and glory.
"Dirty Angel"
everything there was to know;
I am going to jump into a much debated topic in the video game community. Everyone is open to their opinion, but I am going to give mine. We are talking about two of the biggest games in the Call of Duty franchise, Black Ops and Modern Warfare 3.
Ayase is shown to basically be in love with Gai, shock horror what a twist, Gai helpfully fills Shu in on what the vial contained and did and what the power he’s got does and stuff, then he decides to make his underground rebel group go out and rescue a bunch of people, and he asks Shu whether he’ll be a pussy for life or not. Not that they wait to actually get an answer from him before adding him to the operation though, no, making plans for if he decides to not help would just be too logical!
My point I was trying to make last week is that the Republicans don’t want them in the streets, the people, because they would like them to fight the way THEY fight, with lobbyists, where they will lose.
(***) ONLY included on the Deluxe Edition (Edited)
Is Jem awake yet? NO! Jem is not awake yet!
Another inconsistency is that holiday lettings accommodation have allowable deductions for repairs and maintenance, water rates, depreciation on fixtures and fittings and even the TV Licence! No such allowances are made for pubs (or for that matter shops). And I'll never believe a 'poor farmer' again when their land and most of their business related buildings are exempt from business rates.
I do remember saying to myself that "this won't last" (as in these awful moments will not be here forever, we will know more at some point), I just didn't know if I would have my sweet Ella with me when the moments were over, so I was trying to spend as much time soaking her in as I was able. I was so glad I had taken the video that I shared in my last post. So much fear and uncertainty.
I am married unto you: Jeremiah 3:14
b. A lamb without spot, sinless
So we did the typical girl on girl thing. You know. The thing two horny chicks would do to each other, especially if there's a cute guy in the room taking photos of them. In a short amount of time (after enough photos were taken) the camera was abandoned and the hot making-out started.
And I really want you to remember that everything you work on in the query is stuff you MUST also do for the novel. Yes, you're saying the sentences of the query aloud. YES you're saying the sentences in the novel aloud. Maybe not every single one, but at this point, probably a lot of them.
Onion - 1/4 cup chopped
Everybunny should have this cute set especially if you enjoy coloring. I cased this adorable card from Mary-Jo's blog ( Technostamper). She did such a great job with the layouts and designs. I cased this card with just a few minor changes. I wanted to put ribbon where her sentiment was, added the Crystal Effects in the balloon. Hope you like it.
09. The Difference (Feat. M-Dot)
This blog began in an (I’ll admit it) fairly random and rambling fashion. Although still plagued with an overabundance of parentheses, colons (full and semi) and asides, things have calmed down somewhat into a regular, one-book-review-per-entry format.
If you've come here from Kathleen's Blog, you are on the right path. If this is your first stop on the hop, that will work too (just keep hopping till you get back here again).
Deschutes Brewery Hop In The Dark Cascadian Dark Ale
Angle: From the balcony. Adjust: None.
The common name for the Red-winged Blackbird is taken from the mainly black adult male's colouring and distinctive red shoulder patches, which are visible when the bird is flying or displaying.
According to the Toronto Star article, the sandwich bun originates from Golden Wheat Bakery (across the street from The Fish Store). The fish sandwich includes lettuce, tomato and red onions, and your choice of fish (price varies). The fish is grilled to perfection with seasonings. I think it includes lemon pepper, dehydrated garlic, dehydrated parsley, dried chili pepper, lemon juice, balsamic vinegar, olive oil dressing.
Well, I didn't write about the one American we met, because he was totally disinterested in the fact that I was American and instead spoke to Galadriel in French... with a New York accent. He has a B&B in the area and to be fair, he only talked to Galadriel because he wanted to be in her B&B guide (or not get kicked out of it...I'm not sure which). He was all business. But still, it was disconcerting to just follow them around the place (me and the cats) without him at least once saying, "So, where are you from in the states?" I could have fallen off a cliff and he wouldn't have noticed.
During the Christmas period so much goes to waste - wrapping paper, unwanted presents, food, drinks, plastic plates etc. Not only does it burn a hole in our pockets but it adds greatly to the landfills around the World. With this in mind I thought this year I am going to have an eco friendly Christmas. Now I have two small kids so I still need to make it all christmassy and not to boring so over the next couple of months I will provide ideas on how to have an eco-friendly, kid-friendly Christmas - if you have ideas please feel free to provide details below in the comments section or email me at amanda@greenmeoz.com.au.
3 situation
We ventured to the very back of the lot where we found people selling their wares and for much more economical prices than in the main buildings so needless to say I scored a few great deals for my redecorating project that was in the front of mind as I shopped.
into being.
With less sense than rabbits
what is not said:
She went from physical therapy to speech therapy- where Marissa's doctor performed a 90 minute assessment of Marissa's speech.
6. Constantly evolving
How am I with evidence which does not fit my understanding? I am finding the holes in it, of course. But I have emailed to ask if the Spirit Release Foundation have any follow-up of the case. I seek to be open to possibilities, even those I find unattractive.
6. Fill the remainder of the plastic cup with the coconut mixture."
“But how can you-”
i’m trying, with every fiber of my being, to steer myself toward the light.
KXDSR Blog (kxdsrblog.wordpress.com) is a participant in the Amazon Services LLC and Amazon EU Associates Programmes designed to provide a means for sites to earn advertising fees by advertising and linking to amazon.com, amazon.ca, amazon.co.uk, amazon.de, amazon.fr, amazon.it and amazon.es. Certain content that appears on this website comes from Amazon Services LLC and/or Amazon EU. This content is provided “as is” and is subject to change or removal at any time.
And then you went to court in November, and I lost my mind. I didn’t even know what county you were in, or how to find out what happened to you if you disappeared. You called me and I was so flipping relieved . . . I can’t even begin to tell you. I seriously think I hung up the phone and fell over and slept for hours from sheer exhaustion.
Miles walked: 523
Nine per cent of youngsters gave a history of heart related problems while 20 per cent of the respondents’ family members had history of hypertension.
Maybe you would like to see some of the pictures I have taken since September? I'll show them anyway. About at the time when the computer crashed, I saw the most exotic butterfly in my life:
Mothers who have gone before me understand and mothers who have yet to go through this stage do not look forward to it. 2012 is the year my first child will be graduating from high school and I will be learning to let go a little bit more. There are a plethora of books on raising toddlers and there are books that guide you into your empty nest stage of life, but what about the stage where you are asked to release one child a little bit more and let God takeover. My children were dedicated in church as infants, made the decision to follow Christ at various ages and I know God loves them even more than I do. But while growing up they still needed me to guide them, educate them, and love them when they were hurt or disappointed. That need is waning and what has amazed me is the amount of sadness I have felt this year as I learn to let go of my first child.
But in 1803 the State did what a thousand years of pillaging and raiding could not. With a flourish of a quill, the Weihenstephan Monastery was secularised, or religiously decommissioned. Every brewery possession and brewing right was transferred to the Bavarian state. Fortunately the brewery was taken over as a working brewery and not sold to a cheesy moustached developer with non-pleated slacks and carved up into a thousand pokey little lots with pissy two storey townhouses on them. The tradition was to continue because the drinkers of Bavaria deemed the beer too good to lose.
All I feel is heat. The most phenomenal heat rising in and around me. Everything goes utterly silent. We stare at each other. I’m paralysed, standing there in only a t-shirt, the man staring at me.
My office is an add-on to the house. It has lots of light, a small wooden desk, and a bunch of bookshelves lining the walls. It usually has a couple dogs and at least three cats in it at any given time. ;-)
When our forefathers wrote the Declaration of Independence, they understood this all too well:
it is true said the spider
Bite-sized baby burgers are going to take over On My Plate. Grilled little hunks of seasoned beef, topped with melting cheese, and sandwiched with toasted bread, tomato, and pickle are great appetizers for backyard cookouts. Dip them in ketchup and mustard, or eat them plain. Just like real babies, love the little things and enjoy them while you can.
I’m a stupid fuck, and now I have no phone or non-school internet access. I’m pretty sure I’m also on high alert kid watch. As in, I’m not going anywhere for a loonngggg time. How long? Watch all of the Harry Potter movies consecutively whilst holding your breath, and you’ll know how long.
I'm very excited and very overwhelmed already. I've spent the last several days purging and packing part of my studio. Every item must leave the basement, kitchen and dining room. I'm sure I'll eventually need to remove all the stuff from our closets upstairs as well when construction gets to that point.
I highly recommend Caine's Pestilence as a fun and thought-provoking good read. This is one of the most intriguing and best novels that I have ever read. You can find John Bascom's site here.
Dream in green!
13Steps were formed in CheongJoo City 9 years ago.
enjoying - working in the garden, then soaking in a hot bath
WAYS TO BRIGHTEN UP A BORING DAY
No uncertainty in this
But, meeting a popular standard of beauty is not the only reason why some women choose breast implants. Some women are less about trying to look like a cover girl or a swimsuit model and more about simply overcoming some lifelong insecurities.
—Adrienne Rich
I've had an idea for a one-person teapot shape, not made one in years .
Through her laughter, Lisa picks out another love heart.
In contrast, there are times whan you should ALWAYS ask a question. The first example, and only example for now, is the classic cock blocker at the club. You know, the ugly friend of the hottie that you’re talking to. You keep trying to get said hottie alone, she wants to (a) tag along (b) talk to her friend without your ears in the conversation, or (c) leave you behind and go somewhere else with the hottie, effectively stealing the coitus. That bitch! Ask her aloud and clearly if she is trying to cock block. But don’t ask until you know that’s exactly what she’s doing. Ask her why. Ask her is she carrying a lesbian crush. Ask her why she is protecting her friend’s va- jay-jay. If the hottie protects her friend’s cock-blocking position, you’re buying free drinks. You should not have to be paying her bills to get laid.
The conversation was good. I was straightforward with her. And it came down to this: I am welcome to stay at the job, she will give me time off for interviews if I ever get them, and I need to give notice when I go. Oh, and I need to pick up the pace a little (I've not done so well lately - I've missed 2 out of 3 weeks of work due to this cold).
Organizations large and small have, for the most part, realized the value of Twitter. Individuals are beginning to realize that not only can they follow their favorite celebrity, keep up with their friends, and share their daily experiences, they can also find more information on those topics relevant to their own health and where to get the care that they need. I actually follow some hospitals, health care industry topics and individuals that are significant contributors to HIT (healthcare information technology).
Add salt to taste
Close the doors, put out the light
As the case unfolded, however, circumstances became clearer. The other girl in the trailer was 14, though she had told the men she was 18. Mr. Neesmith’s lawyers pointed out that a statutory rape charge could be brought. So could drug charges.
All in all, this seems like a great idea for a mobile payment tool. Once set up, the app seems simple and well designed, however it seems like ParkMobile forgot to include “new users” in their mobile design strategy. If you know about the app, and are signing up from home, there is no easy way to locate available parking zones. If you are parking and a nearby sign (presumably) indicates that you can use MobilePark, I felt like there were too many steps to set up the system. They did a good job answering the question of how to improve street parking, but now it now needs to answer the question of how to improve the user interaction. If they can’t solve that, they are going to lose potential subscribers who can’t figure out how to use the system.
Because of a particularly bad computer-ate-my-writing experience, whenever I finish writing for the day, I try to print out what I've written and add it to a binder specifically for that story. Now that my characters have moved back in time almost three hundred years, I've had to give them new, period-appropriate names. I've done this for most, but not all of them. It's proving very difficult, especially when a character has lived with a name for so long. Somehow, radically changing other fundamental things about the characters as a result of the temporal move has not been nearly as difficult.
friends and hung out with them while we were there, and ended up taking an extra kid home with
Next set of eyeshadows are the lighter shades :) First off, 16핑크핑크 (pink pink)~ same thing happened with this eyeshadow. Huge chunk missing :( However, I think this may also be due to the fact that some of the little cases are harder to open than others. I actually never close this one anymore because it's too hard to open. In addition, more of the eyeshadow becomes loose and falls all over the place when I try to pry it back open.
Ok. I know it has been a while since I've posted a card, but I've been busy doing other crafty things. I've been crocheting doilies and pot scrubbers, painting and padding the top of the stool in my craft room, (thinking about) refinishing a cubby organizer for my daughters hair clips, elastics, etc., sewing scrub hats for me to wear at work, and making felt posies. I will post pictures of all my fun stuff as soon as I take some. I haven't taken the time to do that yet! Besides that fact, my craft cave is so messy from having 8 million projects in the works, I would have to clean it up first! *sigh*
Bleeeeeeeep
The Revenge of Frankenstein is an interesting film because it develops the character of Frankenstein. He changes from the first film. He is much more demented here than in The Curse of Frankenstein. Why should he not be? He escaped death only to become a hero to future patients, and made a scientific breakthrough only to have it blow up in his face at the most inopportune time. His journey into madness is very well done for a low budget Hammer Film.
These three points I have wanted to mention. I am sure of them from the Koran of the Turks. What I have heard beside I will not bring forward, because I cannot be sure about it. Suppose, then, that there are some Christians among the Turks; suppose that some of them are monks; suppose that some are honorable laymen; even then, what good can there be in the government and the whole Turkish way of life, when according to their Koran these three things rule among them; namely, lying, murder, and disregard of marriage, and besides, everyone must keep Christian truth quiet and dare not rebuke or try to reform these three points, but must look on and consent to them, as I fear, at least so far as to be silent? How can there be a more horrible, dangerous, terrible imprisonment than a life under such a government? Lies destroy the spiritual estate, murder the temporal, disregard of marriage the estate of matrimony. Now take out of the world veram religionem, veram politiam, veram oeconomiam, i.e., true spiritual life, true temporal government, and true conduct of the home; what is left in the world, but flesh, world and devil? A life there is like the life of the “good fellows” who keep house with harlots.
Mat Zain was referring to a remark made by de facto law minister Datuk Seri Nazri Aziz, who said repayment of the federal loan was the best solution to put an end to the ongoing controversy without forcing a resignation from the women, family and community development minister.
After birth the memory generally fades regarding this and we find ourselves in situations, relationships and services to others which often feel either too short-lived (not all contracts are supposed to last forever,) or too long-lived. We find ourselves getting locked into obligations, fears of loss, comfort zones etc, and we don’t let the soul have a say regarding the right time for contracts to start, be re-negotiated or be released. We have forgotten what we set up before birth!
She stopped the car in her driveway, and froze with her hands on the wheel. She should turn around and take him back to his bus. She wasn’t going to make herself a one-night stand, a moment of weakness, a mistake, just another cheap groupie looking for someone to brag about. But he was honest with her, and she appreciated him all the more for it. He placed his hand on hers. She turned her head, looked deep into his eyes. Satisfied, she took the keys out of the ignition, and opened her car door, walking up to the house without looking back…..
This post should have happened yesterday, but it slipped my mind completely,
her now and then to disappointment -
And another mound of new things from recent are presents my mum brought me from England (such a surprise!)
Jintan: Sorry, um, I’ll just go away home!
Emirates’ torrid growth means it is constantly adding new destinations. Some are exotic, such as recently added Lusaka, Zambia, and Vietnam’s Ho Chi Minh City, starting next month.
We are now reminding you to celebrate the feast of Booths in the month of Kislev.
Most of Marr's poems are short(many of them considerably shorter than those below). Many are humorous, and some have such surprising endings they almost take your breath away. Marr is a past president of the Illinois State Poetry Society, and a member of the Poets Club of Chicago and the Kentucky State Poetry Society. He has edited and published several anthologies of Chinese and Taiwanese modern poetry, and also pursues other artistic interests including painting and sculpting. He has held several solo as well as group exhibits in the Chicago area, Beijing, and on the Internet. His Website at http://wmarr9.home.comcast.net/~wmarr9/bmz.htm contains images of his art work as well as selections from his poetry books. A scientist by profession, he has lived and worked in the Chicago area since 1970.
craft
To make my fiery star block that I’m working on this week, I began with a hand-drafted pattern that I learned how to make in a workshop I attended recently from Gail Garber. You can read more about that awesome class HERE.
Dear Diane,
Thanks to Peteformation Fashion House for inventing the greatest wear for 2012 !
“You do too much!”
I don’t remember what I said, or did, but I remember how unexpected it was. I’d watched my share of Lifetime movies (the man hater’s channel, as I like to call it) and anytime a man had to spank a woman in the teeth, or give her a punch; she always had enough breath to say something shitty or ask him why.
3) Visit Creative Kuts Store (you will need to do this to meet the last requirement)
"This is an absolute fact. This is objective. This is not a subjective opinion," says Zyman. "Jay could be sitting here, and he could be composing right now. He could finish a piano sonata before our eyes in probably 25 minutes. And it would be a great piece."
On his return he offered me first, the half pint glass. Mmm lovely. He obviously put the beers in the wrong glasses. This was a delightful 8% Allagash - Flexus 2011French Style Farmhouse Ale. This would do very nicely for a start. However, I was soon to learn that this was his first choice and my beer was indeed in my third pint glass. Wow- absolutely gorgeous. He knows me so well.
He ordered some sort of BLT Panini and I ordered myself a bowl of Italian wedding soup, a roast beef sandwich, and a coffee.
Things are so much fun right now at the Tour de Writing! Marisa (elegant snobbery) has led a group of writers into a fast pace into the sprints. Ann Marie made some campy progress while roughing it, and there is a strong middle group of riders, chugging along!! Great job on all the progress last week, everyone.
It's a perfect light appetizer. Enjoy with a glass of white wine!
Republica Ready to go UK
I was at a yard sale with my son and I spotted a small Fisher Price piano that plays three nursery songs: The Muffin Man, This Old Man, and Pop Goes the Weasel. I began to plink on the keys, remembering such a toy that I owned as a child. I bought it for fifty cents and went on my way.
Tenor Christopher Campbell as Don José
Without a sundial for the shifting zodiac
Tam didna mind the storm a whistle.
with the flicker of one big red candle;
Above and below, it's old folks day at Mann's Chinese Theater in fabulous Hollywood, California! One of the top items on my bucket list is to make it out to the West coast some day and see all the vestigal traces of the classical Hollywood studio system still lying around in the city "with more stars than in the heavens"... and here are a quintet of oldies who beat me to it sometime in the 70's. The back features a bevy of sketches from the front cement pavement which holds the footprints and signatures of the likes of Clark Gable, Jean Harlow, and everybody-else-you-can-think-of from 1920's-1950's Hollywood, but my scan was bad so you'll have to use your imagination.
I used to hestitate. I used to pause, evaluating the tolerance level of my audience before proceeding to what would inevitably in some way or other define the future interactions and relationship between myself and the curious inquirer.
Vanya stepped off the ladder of the Medved lander. Pushing off the ground, he made a few light hops across the Moon’s surface that belied his large stature. Joining Kostya, Vanya looked out of the rocky, crater pocked landscape.
Overall, this movie is very good, I would recommend my family to watch it! I think I will watch 2nd time because there is IMAX 2D showing up in TGV Sunway Pyramid. Rating would be 7.5/10, Alex Hopper girlfriend is kind of hot at the beginning of the movie, but at the end the girlfriend looks is kind of different. Nice sound effect and bursting scene, some surprising scene you might need not to miss it! So I believe that this is the movie you must not miss in this year!
He’s opened up his mind to learn
Then at 2:40 I woke up. And I mean, why wouldn't I check my phone for an email at that hour? (Anyone in the adoption world knows that 2:40am in Michigan is actually 9:40am in Ethiopia.)
The recipe is from the Junior League of New Orleans.
Ew. Dogs.
I will never forget my dog's eyes the times he bit me. He would pull his ears back, coming again close to me but very slowly, like asking me for permission to approach me; his eyes, round and regretful as if to say, "I'm so sorry, I just couldn't control myself", conveyed the most sincere and genuine apologies I have ever received; so, I was never able to punish him.
Yesterday I decided to tackle what seemed like the impossible to me, Macaroons.
I luuuuuuuurve the slow cooker. It’s that mgical implement that chicken noodle soup, pumpkin soup, stew and other yummy dishes come out from. Tonight, I’m giving you three recipes for the slow cooker. I’ll be honest and say I’m a dud cook, so clearly Daniel is the maestro at this thing.
WHERE TO GET WINE ON TAP:
It’s David Hasselhoff!!
I started with an adapted version of this recipe, adding some spices and the streusal crust (blended flour, brown sugar, vanilla sugar, cinnamon and nutmeg with butter and coating the inside of the pan before adding batter). I had hoped that the streusal (I never spell that word right on the first try) would stay a little crumbly but that didn't work out. Instead it formed a crispy caramel-like layer around the banana bread, delicious happy accident.
13.I'm A Travelling Man
I'm going to be weighed again at Slimming World tonight... I'm dreading it!
Let's breach the bridge of years,
Instead of fear, we have love to drive us: “Perfect love drives out fear.”
Hazen created the custom holographic image and embossed it onto transfer film that was coated in-house. Hazen then metallized the transfer holographic material and transfer metallized the coated two-side NewPage paper stock. The final step involved sheeting and printing the 19×36 inch sheets in register with the holography. Once printed, the cover was bound to the program by Quad/Graphics, Sussex, Wisconsin.
So here are a few of the links that caught my eye!
Just pop ‘em in the sling
So how do vegetarians get protein? First, I think we should talk about how much protein we need. According to Dr. T. Colin Campbell and his book, “The China Study”, the optimal amount of protein for us to consume is about 10% of our daily calories. This is equivalent to about 50-60 grams of protein per day depending on body weight. The average American consumes about 15% -16%, or 70-100 grams of protein per day. The latest research suggests the promotion of cancer cells at levels above 10% of animal protein.
Once back from Cornwall, we went to see The Nice Man again for a check up. He had a good feel about and reassured me that Eric did not have an enlarged liver (I'd been worried about that as we lost Eric's brother, Edmund, last year to liver cancer and his liver had been grossly enlarged) and prescribed some more antispasmodics.
At the Walk-About on Saturday, another 20 boxes were sold. Way to go girls!
What stronger love can a man or idiot show his wife than the willful flaming destruction of most of his own home in order to kill an unknown insect that may, or may not have, bit his beloved bride?
The 2 custodians introduce themselves to Helen as Kitty and Henrietta. Kitty, the one with the story, tells Helen that some woman heard a loud banging noise while she was in the tub. The woman called 911, but no one believed her. Afterwards, she was found murdered, and the supposed murder weapon was a hook. The 2 women tell Helen that the story was in the paper, but that no one really believed that the killer was actually Candyman.
Look up from your computer. Now, don’t look back again. Instead, look at the person walking by wearing the nice hat. Sure looks like a normal, well-adjusted individual, hey? So nice they might even be volunteer coach for the local adolescent sports team. Don’t be fooled by this friendly exterior, because it might only be hiding something dark and sinister:
-Squad + RPG
The book doesn't cover objections at all, but that choice doesn't surprise me. Most practitioners don't see objections as a big deal, and the MPEP does contain some bare bones information about objections. Also, because objections are handled by petition rather than appeal, there is very little precedential case law on objections.
She's in for a change this school year. She'll no longer be living in her fancy digs at BridgeStreet with its room-service and made to order breakfasts, instead, she'll be renting a home with 4 other women from college just a few blocks from the campus. It's what she wanted and I don't think she could be more excited for the school year to begin.
It tasted DELISH and I commend it to the house.
1894 East Washington Avenue
Of course, he hasn’t needed that safety net in a long time, and likely won’t again. But Stephen King hasn’t forgotten, as so many other rich people in American culture seem to have, how the programs funded by tax dollars helped him to reach his current level of wealth and status. It’s nice to think “I did it all by myself”, but King has the humility to recognize that he’s been propped up along the way by his society. The truth he espouses is simple: taxes are a small price to pay for the privilege of getting to be Stephen King.
The Transformation experience is designed to help you achieve results while greatly increasing your ability to maintain these successes throughout your life. To achieve this objective, your Transformation will evolve over a 12-week period. Important principles will be introduced at each step in the process—designed to help you move on to the next level. Results will come as you implement each principle and then incorporate it into your daily routine.
And experiences are what make up
Furthermore, Kerri is learning to understand the boy's reactions, and be kind and compassionate to him - but she also now knows that when he is not acting appropriately, she can speak up and action is taken and she does not have to put up with any abuse. Instead of shunning the boy, the class is learning to accept, forgive, and love him despite his sometimes mean and aggressive behaviour. And instead of excusing the boy, the school takes actions and the boy knows it is not OK - even if he cannot control himself - to behave badly towards others. And somehow it is working, because the kids still play with him and like him, and when he acts up they now immediately go to the teacher (instead of reacting to the boy). We could all learn a thing or two from these wonderful kids.
They're doing auditions until 7pm tonight, so she said that if I was going to be called back, it would happen later tonight or tomorrow.
1 T butter
A well known writer could not find an artist who dared to illustrate a popular book he was writing on Muhammed.
I adore how you love Thijson
“Oh, no! Blackie, I’m sorry. Are you alright?”
I had two very authentic looking emails this morning from the USPS (United States Postal Service), confirming orders of stamps and shipping labels. I have ordered stamps online, but not in ages. Odder still, the supposed order dates for these purchases was mid-March.
5-You have paid holidays.
My kittones are snuggling close to me at every opportunity ... I'm reading Jonathan Franzen's Freedom whenever I can focus on a page ... bathing a lot ... sleeping like a stone. I've contracted an awful chest cold ... and must keep myself as potent as possible.
This is a very large cartoon: "A cartoon is a form of two-dimensional illustrated visual art. While the specific definition has changed over time...... Cartoons were typically used in the production of frescoes, to accurately link the component parts of the composition when painted on damp plaster over a series of days (giornate). Such cartoons often have pinpricks along the outlines of the design; a bag of soot was then patted or "pounced" over the cartoon, held against the wall to leave black dots on the plaster ("pouncing"). Cartoons by painters, such as the Raphael and examples by Leonardo da Vinci, are highly prized in their own right."(Merriam Webster's Dictionary). I was very drawn to this piece, but did not have enough background on the subject to pull the trigger, even though the price was moderately alluring for the size and look. It is worthwhile to take photographs and notes when you shop. Next time, I'll look for pinpricks and soot.
Start them.
sister hath left me to serve alone? bid her therefore that she help
If you are in the Indianapolis area and are interested in having Sunny come to your home for a session on healthy Chinese cooking, go to her website and contact her about having your own dinner party. Our host had purchased the event through Groupon but we all decided that we learned so much and enjoyed the food so much that we would eagerly split the cost to have another evening with Sunny. For 6 people, the cost would be $25 per person and the information is truly invaluable and inspiring! She also offers cooking classes and can be found at events throughout the year.
Or comet that may range on high;
As for the present, Diane simply wanted the open, honest interaction that had existed between them for so long to be restored. She wasn't quite sure how long the present terrible state of affairs had gone on for – the onset had been gradual. Was it weeks, or months? Whatever it was, nothing she said or did seemed to have any effect. For hours on end there would be a dreadful, barren gulf between them: straightforward conversation was impossible. The expressions on John's face would suddenly seem alien to her: looking at it it had sometimes crossed her mind that, had she been looking at a passport photograph and not a real face, she would not have recognised it.
The only photo I have of him is on paper and I could copy it over, but then I would have to hunt for the card reader or the download cable oh and the camera - and let us face life is too short to be looking for what is not here right now.
In 1983 I decided that I needed to make a major lifestyle change. I stopped spending my hard earned money on smoke and drink and in an effort to get back to the way I was raised, began purchasing Fishing and Camping gear. I bought a $100 boat and trailer, a $800 dollar motor and put about $1000 worth of high Tech amenities on board.
For Jewish Baseball Players:
Eurycoma longifolia commonly known as Tongkat Ali or Pasak Bumi is a traditional plant used frequently enhancer countries such as China, India and Malaysia in libido. Recently, it has grown in popularity worldwide because of its success rate. In this article we will discuss the benefits and how they can help to overcome problems of sexual health and more.
Gosh, another week has been on gone, think I blinked and missed it!
Note: Their pouches are not BPA free. Salmon sold in pouches is “pouched” in Thailand and sourced in Alaska or Russia. In terms of contaminants, they should be pretty much the same, says one expert. (If Russian salmon is Atlantic and not Pacific salmon, however, avoid it. It could have grown up near a large nuclear sub base.)
1. H-E-B seasoned boneless skinless chicken thighs for fajitas, 5 lbs. for $5 at H-E-B (through 12/7/10)
“It is here. I have found it after all these years.” William cast down his lighter and with reverence, slowly made his way to the pool. The mist of the falling water cooled his hot skin. His mouth fell open, ready to drink its fill. The pain of his arm ebbed away with each step closer to the water.
And just as I thought I couldn't take it anymore, the game was over!!! And with a run from my chair, I grabbed my bag that contained jeans and a hoody and comfy undies and sprinted to the bathroom to make my change from gaseous trollop to everyday average girl.
Puree everything together and you have a persilade. Smell the green summer paste. Chances are you will want to have it just like that. Make slices all over the lamb/chicken/fish.Liberally salt the insides of the butterflied leg of lamb (or the thigh/ breast of the chicken OR all over the ribs OR the haddock cubes). Slap the insides of the butterflied leg of lamb (or the thigh/ breast of the chicken OR all over the ribs OR the haddock cubes)with the persilade. Wrap the meet like a sandwich. Just flip one side over the other. FOr ribs and fish of course you don't have to do this. Salt and persilade the upper surfaces of the meet sandwich.
But so what? I’m an indie. I’ve been saying for a while I think we’ve seen a change in what that means as more and more people with mainstream genre books have “gone indie”, meaning they’ve self-published, usually through Kindle. Heck, I’ve had a genre book in the top 100 bestsellers for almost 3 weeks. But for me whilst that’s great, and it’s been a financial lifeline at an incredibly difficult time on a personal level, it has nothing to do with REALLY being indie. I argued in April that the real winners on Kindle would be prolific midlisters who built a fanbase and didn’t rely on market vagaries – they would successfully replace the modest-income-addition they’d lost as publishers dropped their modest-income-addition-generating midlist.
There have been a lot of heavy emotions and tough subjects coming up for me lately. Which means this blog has been a little on the depressing side as well. I decided on this Monday to give myself a little extension on my weekend and stay away from the serious stuff. A few bloggers I follow have been take a break to answer some silly questions and let people know a little more about themselves outside of the norm. I decided to take a page from their books and do the same. I picked 25 questions from The Other Side of Infidelity and Sunday Stealing that I thought would be fun and interesting to answer. Here they are in no particular order:
I want less stress, less chaos, fewer faulty systems -let's shake up the old ones please -, less blame and passing the buck, less rush and less noise.
“A polite email or call to the Whitehaven News to firmly express your outrage about this disgraceful situation would also be appreciated,” Mr Jefferson said.
Some on the bare ground, some on planks or stretchers, some in the
5. “Getting Down to What is Really Real”: the most boring essay, to me. I’ve never watched MTV’s The Real World, never will. That’s what this essay is about, and I could care less. JJS doesn’t make me care more.
5. My bum's really small, but yours is very big.
All of it works. The Avetts know their way around the banjos and pianos and sparse percussion, and G. Love is still an extreme talent on the harmonica and his acoustic guitar work is underrated. Fixin’ to Die is certainly his most countrified album, but it comes off as an authentic session and not at all contrived.
And, don't forget Flourishes' New Release Bundle! If you buy all three sets in a bundle, you save 10% off the price. But, this offer only lasts through next Friday, February 17th. So... you have to act fast! Just click HERE to see!
5. Add first portion of the green onions and red onions and cook for 1 more minute. Pour half of vinaigrette down the side of the wok, and then shake pan to release the beef and toss with the vinaigrette. Add 1 t butter and continue to shake pan until butter melts. Remove the meat and onions from the wok. Keep warm.
dash of dark soy
The army banner bearer carries the army or alliance colors and represents the rally point for the whole army.
in a large bowl.
Harihareswar temple is present here. In this temple Moola virat is in the combined form of Lord vishnu and Lord shiva.This previosly called as Guharanya and ruled by Guhasura.Lord Vishnu and Lord shiva combinely forms Harihar rupa and kílls Guhasura. From that onwards That place is called as Harihar.
The threats are uncalled for. It smacks of racism and high handedness. It is unbecoming as a Chief Minister to hurl threats to schools who subscribes to the two newspapers of their choice.
Although I complain that there are not very many nonfiction writers present, it is a place of opportunity. Having my booth there is great for visibility and tying into my other projects. As I promote upcoming events, I can evolve and rotate in this space, gaining experience as I learn what works. Because ideas that work here at Book Island can be a test ground for what can work in the larger e-marketplace.
Stay tuned. Tomorrow, I've got owl news, fun with weather maps, another teaser on our new museum resident, and much more!
But it does confirm the Dean Swift as one of London's most exciting beer pubs. I hope to eat there as soon as possible. And I hope they'll let me host a beer and food matching event with similar ambition in the near future.
I believe that all Americans deserve equal rights and equal opportunity. I support a woman's right to abortion because I support the bodily integrity of all citizens. If you do not believe in abortion, it is your right to say so, and to not have an abortion, but it is not your right to keep others from having or providing abortions. I support the right to gay marriage, because I believe all people should be free to love whom they wish, and should enjoy the same legal protections under law. If you are against homosexuality on principal, you have the right to say that, and to reject homosexuality as your lifestyle, but you do not have the right to dictate that others should, too. I believe that all people, regardless of race, sex, or orientation deserve to have an equal right to education and jobs. I believe that people have a right to health insurance that is not predicated on their employment, and I believe that everyone deserves a helping hand when times get tough. I believe that we must deal compassionately and fairly with people who seek a new life in our country, addressing the root causes of their exodus if possible. I believe the government plays a role in facilitating these things. You may disagree with me, or propose other solutions to these problems, but you do not have the right to malign the names of certain people or groups as a tactic to switch blame for or attention from problems. I support a strong division between church and state as a bulwark against tyrannical and theocratic rule. You may disagree with me on which, if any religion is "right" or "wrong", but you do not have the right to impose your religion on me.
I’ll offer no pity, to carry your shame,
" … if the worker’s savings are not to remain merely the product of circulation - saved up money , which can be realised only by being converted sooner or later into the substantial content of wealth, pleasures etc. – then the saved up money would itself have to become capital, i.e. buy labour, relate to labour as use-value. It thus pre-supposes labour which is not capital, and presupposes that labour has become its opposite – not labour. In order to become capital, it itself presupposes labour as not-capital as against Capital; hence it presupposes the establishment at another point of the contradiction it is supposed to overcome. If, then, in the original relation itself, the object and the product of the worker’s exchange – as product of mere exchange, it can be no other – were not use value, subsistence, satisfaction of direct needs, withdrawal from circulation of the equivalent put into it in order to be destroyed by consumption – then labour would confront capital not as labour, not as not-capital, but as capital. But capital, too, cannot confront capital if capital does not confront labour, since capital is only capital as not-labour; in this contradictory relation. Thus the concept and the relation of capital itself would be destroyed.”
Last night, The Boyfriend and I were having dinner at the local Pizza Hut. Yes, on Valentine's Day, we were dining at Pizza Hut- largely because I was too tired to cook and because my paycheck doesn't post until around midnight. That $10 large pizza was calling my name when I got out of work.
Granted, all of this happens between 8:30 (their "up to bed" time) and 9:00 (the latest point that they are allowed to have lights on) so technically, they are still within the rules, sort of. They have hit on a grey area of the rules and I figure, well, they are getting along, working together, helping each other, I'll let it go.
Roll out dough and use cookie cutters
Melissa Allen – “Become A Motorcycle: Understanding and Writing Gendai Haiku.” In Japanese, gendai means modern. When applied to haiku, this word signifies that a poem has moved away from traditional haiku poetics, whether in subject matter, structure, or language use. Bring a gendai haiku you have written, if you have one. Please feel free to attend if you don’t, and attend even if you know little or nothing about gendai. We will briefly discuss the nature of gendai and read some well-known examples, such as the motorcycle haiku by Kaneko Tohta, quoted in the workshop’s title. Next, we will discuss our own haiku, and in the process, try to better understand what is meant by gendai.
That in itself could be a heavy lift for agencies already struggling with budget-driven staff shortages.
All this gym time guys are spending these days is probably the biggest representation of that. The general consensus these days, is that a man with a hot body is what all females want *cue males Stonebridge to Brixton signing up at gym*.
Sports cars from the Porsche stable were in very strong demand around the world in March 2012. In the Middle Kingdom, 2,572 new cars were delivered to Chinese customers; an increase of 63.3 per cent compared with March 2011. The 911, Cayenne, Panamera, Boxster and Cayman sports cars were very popular in the European market as well, selling 5,214 units (+29.7 %). In Germany, Porsche handed over 1,632 vehicles to happy customers, posting an increase of 15.5 per cent in the process compared with the same month the year before. Deliveries in the USA were marked by the change of model of the rear and mid-engine sports cars 911 and Boxster.
14 He's Gone
1. Out tonight (2:56)
First of all, I apologize for being a bad blogger friend and not doing a post for Friday :(
I don’t know about the rest of you, xpecially those of you who actually did the right blog on the right day, but I’m about blogged out! I could not think of a single thing interesting that started with the letter ‘x’. Of course, I thought of the usual, xylophone, x-ray, x-men, xanadu (BTW the blogger that stuck song that in my head, I’m coming after you) and xenodocheionology.
Baba Yaga is the dark goddess, but then so is Billi. Baba Yaga teaches her to face and integrate that darkness. Billi grows up in Dark Goddess.
Interspersed in the crowd were more children, being sticky and preventing any boobs. I still gave out a lot of beads though, because I believe in fun.
find out that what he was reading was a book by the great Danish philosopher, Søren
Somebody of you maybe will wait for the guest designers who will help us out in our designteam for the comming 3 month.
@Me on Twitter with why you would make a great cupcake judge. I want creativity here. I'm looking for more than something like "I like to eat sweets." Include #cupcakeriot in your tweet. You may only use 1 tweet so choose your 140 characters wisely. If you follow all the instructions, I will @ you back letting you know your place on the list. I will also be taking up to 5 standby judges. If you do not show up at One-2-One Bar by 3:15 pm, you will forfeit your judge's spot to a standby. If you do not follow all the instructions, I won't @you with a confirmation.
Would y'all be sooo KIND & like their fanpage... & help give us a boost? Pretty Please?
It needs a lot of work. The colors were a bit shocking but they're growing on me, hah! One of the books I borrowed from Lesley was Jan Beany & Jean Littlejons exploring color books - purple & yellow...(it worked for them!) So I went for it & added orange...
Red panda
Meanwhile, the NRM’s self-seeking shopping list from Councils throughout the State would see them pocket a cool $24million…with just over $1million coming from the unsuspecting residents of Unley.
If I am lucky he has probably made me unbreakable too.
¾ t fresh black pepper
Cook the pancakes as you would a normal buttermilk pancake, about 3-4 min per side. Wait till you see tiny bubbles form and pop to flip your pancakes!
One hundred senators, 435 congressmen, one President, and nine Supreme Court justices equates to 545 human beings out of the 300 million are directly, legally, morally, and individually responsible for the domestic problems that plague this country.
November 12, 2009
Republicans have now pulled within 44-42 on the generic Congressional ballot, a six point improvement from a 46-38 gap a month ago. A key reason for the tightening is that Republican voters are more unified, saying they plan to vote for their party by an 86-7 margin compared to Democrats who are only committed to theirs by an 81-10 spread. Independents narrowly favor the Democrats 35-33, a reduction in their lead from 37-30 a month ago.
This handsomely packaged set is the most significant Korean release since last year’s Shin Sang-ok Collection, and both belong in any filmlover’s collection. While one can gripe about the condition of the prints and the poor English subtitling, the selection is a fine one, and opinions are likely to be strongly divided over which film is best. My own favorite? Why, Goryeojang, of course! In the meanwhile, The Housemaid, which screened at Cannes in May, is undergoing restoration by the World Cinema Foundation and will hopefully be released on DVD sometime early next year.
He gets that chasing and tickling Abby or letting Elizabeth lay on his chest and chew his nose are more important activities than checking his email.
Interestingly, the research also hinted that infection with EBV and its action on the immune system could also be playing a role in other brain diseases such as cancer and stroke.
* all of the above!
When I worked at Starbucks I bought a pair of khaki shorts to augment my summer work wardrobe. The dress code there required black or khaki bottoms and I found a pair for 10 bucks at Nordstrom Rack and when I tried them on in the dressing room I shrugged and thought, "Well, they're not the worst shorts in the world."
Economic efficiency can be achieved in your business, however ensure you take adequate business planning steps to maximize benefits from reduced resources and methods.
pineapple
Recording of Boston police nets man $170,000 settlement – by Stephen C. Webster – Tuesday, March 27, 2012 15:52 EDT
Boots: Frye....Thrifted...$24
I’m amazed at how often I still blow it as a pastor. Blunders that I feel I should have long since moved past still creep up and bite me from time to time. I guess that realization is a wake up call for me and every pastor to maintain humility and a teachable spirit in our personal lives and our ministries.
Long term, virtual promotions the actual best all fabrics strict and lots broken up ugly.
Wishing you health and happiness,
She was right, though. It is “If a body meet a body coming through the rye.” I didn’t know it then, though.
It's amazing that I can be on here reading other blogs without the motivation to update my own!
ice cream with freezer burn
I can’t afford a closer look at either.
Tanisha
I have been debating whether it’s a memoir, a narrative-non fiction that I could turn into fiction by simply changing names…
After my food adventure at the food market, my next two restaurant dinners would occur just a couple minutes stroll down the road. Restaurante Botin is a deceptively large restaurant (four storeys) that holds the Guiness World Record for the oldest restaurant, having been in operation since 1725! They’re known for their good hearty food so of course I had to try it out.
When some of those standing there heard this, they said, ‘He’s calling Elijah.’
With that, I woke her father and we began mapping out a plan for her. We are fortunate to have dear friends in New Zealand who I knew would be there for her. It gives me great comfort to think of them. This is the most difficult part of being an expat. Different countries, different homes, friends and family spread out across continents. It is like orchestrating a large chess board. A strategy goes in to place but in the end we have to have faith that whatever the move, it is the right one. We started making phone calls and within a short time she had a place to stay if and when she could get to Auckland.
Wait.
Anyway, the piece goes on to say, women went to work, single motherhood lost its stigma and in the meantime, people stopped getting married and children happened. So, what’s my problem? The juicy stuff is here:
(AFP) — A former CIA officer was indicted Thursday on charges of leaking secrets to journalists, including the name of a covert agent and the role of another CIA employee in classified operations.
I did not even mention crime as one of the factors that motivated me to leave (although South Africa is undoubtedly one of the most crime ridden countries in the world) I was simply not a victim of violent crime...Perhaps just by luck?
Dealing with non-performers can be a painful task. However, one point to note is that you cannot allow your good heart to let the ship sink! Non-performers are excess baggage and weigh your organisation down. Unless your team is lean and mean in their performance, it will not be able to compete well in the business environment. Do not forget that your competitors are extremely competent and you will be a laggard in no time, if your team is full of non-performers.
Written By: Doug Prochilo
wondered aloud, illumining the air
I'm hoping to finish last years tomatoes before these ones ripen :)
The red onions Caramelized.
"Cast your cares on God, because God cares for you." (1 Peter 5:7)
Jeans: Target $28.00
The work of the Light has brought you to the moment when a great prosperity is to sweep through your societies. This prosperity heralds a series of governmental changes which will enact, among many things, the legal basis of your freedom and individual sovereignty, accompanied by an official proclamation of this. It is a historic moment. For the first time since you were permitted to enter limited consciousness, you are to be acknowledged as worthy Beings by your former ‘masters.’ At a stroke you become their equal, able to wield justice and appropriate retribution for their crimes against you and your ancestors. This time is when the present reality collapses and is transformed into a vehicle capable of conveying you back to the very threshold of full consciousness. Our responsibility is to take you from that doorway through to your final transformation, which will allow you to take your place once again among your many spiritual and space families. This will be a moment of long-awaited celebration for us all!
Like an acrobat. I remember I was
Suddenly, there he was, sitting calmly on the steps to the cabin, his fat little body resting on his tiny feet. Joe, the chipmunk, has come to say goodbye (I know not tremendously original, but somehow the name suited him.) We first met this cute little guy a couple of days ago, as he came to the porch expecting food.
*uh, can someone please tell me if that should be “WHO” or “WHICH”, since my brain is divided on what sounds better?
5/16 Toronto, ON - Horseshoe Tavern
I would sit in the old church cemetery
be a slow slide down into darkness--
Dr. Who
Turn him loose let him go let him say he outdrew me fair and square
Introduction from SIRVA Relocation
This flick is a guilty pleasure and I regularly watch and enjoy it even though I know it's terrible, but it has a top notch leading man who was perfect for the roll if only it had had a better director and script...
The flowers are so different
The up-side to the single life was that most of my friends were single. We lived life more spontaneously. Much of our social-calendar was written with spur-of-the-moment planning.
* Paper: First Edition~ Love Letters, Papertrey Ink
So last night my mind was on the 2 big projects I need to finish, the bills that are probably late, the packages of Girl Scout cookies to deliver, the errands I should have done on Monday and so on. Oh and let's not forget about the other things I would like to do for ME but never get to because there isn't ever any time left or I'm just too plain exhausted.
9:52 PM – Teddy Long and two cops stand in the ring. Teddy calls out CM Punk for his field sobriety test, but Jericho appears first. He wants to be in the ring to assure that the test is done properly, and to watch Punk get stripped of the title.
Less attention has been placed on the trafficking that comes in to Pakistan from Bangladesh, Nepal, Sri Lanka and Burma. Economic and political refugees may find themselves in Bangladesh and using the same coercive methods can find themselves trafficked to Pakistan. West Pakistan retains a large Bengali inhabitation in particular and they can be easily absorbed into the paras of this area. They arrive in Karachi via Calcutta or Delhi by land. Nepalese are bought and then sold in India. Bangladeshi, Sri Lankan, Nepalese, and Burmese women may also be trafficked through Pakistan en route to the Gulf or Greece.
That was a different time
41. Twilight Zone - Neil Norman & His Cosmic Orch.
Bring to a boil, then turn on low and simmer for anywhere from 2 -4 hours. Most of the meat should have fallen off the bones.
He headed a team that included economists and information scientists from Emory University, a psychologist from the New School for Social Research and anthropologists from the Institute Jean Nicod in Paris, France.
Anyway, there’s a lot going on right now and I just needed to write out my thoughts because, clearly, and I think the snail on the pathway to my front door would agree, I needed it.
Okay. Go! Any questions?
A proper job to occupy their days.
“I am healthy, I wrote a few books that someone somewhere in the world is reading and at least but not last I am a loved women, what more should I want.”
In all things,
In our church (The Church of Jesus Christ of Latter-day Saints -- aka "L.D.S." or "Mormons") our young women throughout the world ages 12-18 are part of an organization that is aptly named "Young Women." This organization helps our teenage girls grow and mature in the gospel of Jesus Christ. The girls and their leaders meet twice weekly -- on Sundays for a spiritually-oriented lesson and once during the week for an activity night. I've been privileged to serve as a leader in Young Women several times, so I was thrilled when one of my daughters called me to let me know that she had been asked to lead the group of Young Women in her congregation.
And me? Some don’t like me either.
As for your host, my pick is simple, it's the Malazan book of the Fallen. However, I would not ask for another decalogy. Thinking that Esslemont will be closing some threads for the characters Erikson left behind, the remaining Malazans are the ones I would like to read about.
Perhaps the greatest blessing I find in these pages is the developing relationship I have with my savior, Jesus Christ. I came here to learn of Him, to love Him, to become His friend.
"I'm afraid I'll miss my chance if I do"
The Biennial was totally in your face and political. And it had all those categories of political war art gushing out of every orifice. But here is the real disservice and travesty:
Every season ticket purchased and paid in full between May 1 and June 30 will have 10 percent of its gross donated to the Oakland public schools. With season tickets starting at $260 a piece and costing as much as $1,510, the donation to the schools can be substantial.
Dr Sim is the sort of candidate that any party would love to have but he is fighting someone who has stood up to the powers-that-be and he will have to convince the voters he can do the same. That is what every SUPP man facing a DAP candidate is up against.
Wrap-around rubber bumpers protected the Sir Vival’s bodywork from errant motorists in slow speed collisions but they were just one of Jerome’s innovations. The Sir Vival was years ahead with seat belts, a padded interior, and built-in roll bars.
We go home. It seems strange, but I call this place home already. The young woman leaves.
Moan mope argh.
of everyday life, there are excuses
He asked them, “What are you discussing together as you walk along?”
The doctors and researchers had been obsessed with the idea of creating a genius like Einstien, a musician alike Mozart and so on. Currently, the new generation wants to breed a new set of off springs having unique set of intelligence and looks. This fascination for having superior breed of humans has existed from times immemorial
Customer: "I don't have any television! I woke up this morning and there's nothing on my screen! I'm so sick of all the problems with you people!"
"The overriding purpose of these rules is to protect these species' survival and foster their recovery, so they can be taken off the lists," Amato said.
Last night I had a spark of genius! Genius I say! After a moment of “I sure hope this works” Chicken crusted with nuts. Yeah, that’s not new. But it was mixed nuts. Emerald Sweet and Salty Cinnamon Sugar Roasted nuts. Yeah, really hoped it would work. And ooo boy it did. Had it on a salad with cranberries and Strawberry Vinaigrette. It was delicious plain. And I bet it’d be great with rice or meifun and some peppers and other veggies for something Thai. And it want it, now.
Old farmhouses or the new purpose built tourist accommodation? Two farmhouses come with a ‘donkey’ – light the wood fire to heat water. There is no electricity, this is WAY off grid. The new houses use traditional mud bricks (= adobe) and eucalyptus beams. There are five cottages spread out, the neighbours far enough away to be undisturbed. Or, you can have a farmhouse all on its own.
The group of volunteers who came before us thought it was so cool in July when we arrived. I always thought they were crazy, that there was no way this July was cooler than the previous one. It's not that their July was hotter, it's just that April is just that hot.
You may solve the mystery that way, but it does not necessarily add up to a good mystery. Formulas and algorithms for writing do not account for the effervescence, the will o' the wisp, the life and soul of a book. If you write it to a formula, it will read like a formula.
Contact :-
Heart melted? Check.
"You see, Scully," he said to his skeptical partner, "the same forces are at work in the urban backyards as those in the crop fields."
It seemed to work - I ran a new PB, finishing in 44:25 (old best was Ellesmere in 48:00). This was a slightly easier course, but I negated that by having to run through half the field. Note to self for next time. Zoe also did very nicely, finishing well up the ladies rankings (7th V35 I think) at a race distance which doesn't suit her.
I had been looking for some open source project so that I could contribute something and make my profile a bit stronger for GSoC 2012. I couldn’t find anything interesting or anything that I could do. I was afraid as I hadn’t contributed anything to the open source community. I was looking for open source projects in python everywhere. Then I found something interesting that I could do. It was a GSoC 2012 project idea of Gentoo Foundation, and I wanted to contribute to it by adding some patch to Portage, Porthole’s Software Management Tool, which is considered one of the best in Linux community. I joined Gentoo-SOC IRC channel, and talked to mentor named dol-sen. He helped me a lot, gave me a couple of links, so I could start my way into portage development. He told me to install Gentoo, as it was necessary, since I had to work on Portage, and it is built for Gentoo. I tried installing Gentoo, but ended up installing Arch Linux (See previous post).
3. The child in me loves Kinder Surprise Eggs (from Europe).
How do you say “hilarious” in Russian?
George is a wonderfully engaging performer… whether that be by the beautiful and powerful music that filled our ears, or by the many funny stories with which he peppered the night. From the moment he took the stage, comfortable in jeans and a Henley, to the moment I walked out the door late that night, it was a night of happiness to remember.
All Fall Down is subtitled A Story of Survival, and the event which our heroine, a thirteen year-old girl called Isabel, has to survive is a truly formidable one: the Black Death of 1349, the deadliest plague in human history. In Sally Nicholls' helpful historical note, she points out that: '...the First World War - the worst disaster Britain has suffered in living memory - killed around 1.55% of the British population. The most recent estimates put the victims of the Black Death at around 45%.'
Fenway Park is a great hitters park -- and, yes, 24 Red Sox hitters have won batting titles through the years. Oakland is a terrible hitters park, in large part because of all the foul ground, and no Oakland A's player has ever won a batting title. . Coors Field is wonderful for hitters -- since 2000, 26 Rockies have hit .300 over a full season. Dodger Stadium is wonderful for pitchers -- since 2000 just 10 Dodgers have hit .300 for a full season. Wrigley Field can be a home run haven when the wind is blowing out -- the Cubs have had five home run champs since 1969. Kauffman Stadium (with the exception of the few years when they moved the fences in) is huge and a place where home runs die at the warning track. The Royals have never had a home run champion.
“As days turned to weeks and the crime went unsolved, blame gradually shifted to Capone. As the largest object in the gangster universe, dispersed matter tended to coalesce around him by force of nature,” Eig writes.
Playing soccer in les Arènes de Lutèce
here is another shot of the top:
21.SHUDDER TO THINK "Drop Dead Don't Blink"
the dimensions of sleep, the shape of sleep
The vast majority of the violence in the Bible is instigated by men, not by God. As for divine violence, I can only say that I wish there were more of it. This generation desperately needs one good Ananias and Saphira moment, a moment when God’s wrath is clearly and unmistakably shown to mankind. Of course, I don’t want to be the victim, and I don’t wish that sort of victimhood on anyone in particular. However, I do ask myself from time to time why Hugh Hefner has been allowed to live into his 80s. Wouldn’t society have benefited if God had wiped out Hefner and Larry Flint long ago in a dramatic display of divine judgment? We Americans are suffering from a lack of clearly divine retribution, not too much of it. The so-called wicked God of the Bible is more merciful than any of us, and we ought to thank him for it.
During the cold winter, I really can't do without my Mongolian fur boots, that I actually hated at first.
Problem: Labels are not feeding properly.
The experience changed Watson so deeply that he committed his life to saving whales. He continues to do this, despite criticism. The criticism comes from conservatives and it comes from progressives who say that he damages their reputation with his cavalier approach. His answer to that is, “So!” He’s not doing it for them, and he’s not doing it for the organization. The whales are his clients and his concern.
I'm something else, you're making weather
The event flew by but we still found time to enjoy the space we were in which included several nice pools, a stream with a small waterfall, and a bonfire. While its no whale-watching, snorkeling, or coral beach, it was a nice break from the daily school grind.
The day of the exchange I was so busy with work and class that I wrapped my gift about 5 minutes before I had to leave to set up for the fellowship. The exchange happened at our annual Christmas party, which was held in the Taproom this year, a cafe-style wooden-floored room at the top floor of the Memorial building on RISD’s campus. There was food, conversation, some music, picture-taking and tacky Christmas sweaters. For the exchange itself, a friend and I passed out all the gifts which was not so easy because people seemed to lack the foresight to actually write the name of the recipient on the gift. With only one hitch (one person didn’t get a gift. Sad, right?) everyone received their gift and began tearing into them. Some of the highlights included a giant pen, a faux piece of bread complete with squishiness and bread smell, a plant, replica wooden Batarang, and a Master Chief cut out art poster handmade by a RISD freshman.
The venues we're going to see are Ordy's favorites... they're back to the barn... as overwhelmed as I've been with barn weddings, it's our only choice now with my venue being taken and not wanting a fancy hotel wedding WE wouldn't even feel comfortable at. Sorry if I've gone back and forth- beggars can't be choosers! It's not that I'm settling, but yes, I really wanted the other venue! But, I must move on. With 157 days left, I need to pick a place so I can start invitations, etc.
and a fire near my sister's boyfriend's house had them leave as well.
Lovely delicacy, slight smoky/spice quality, asian pear too.
Everyone knows that a good race always begins the night before with the carbo loading. My college roommate was in town for a little, and I was happy she was there not only to spend time with her – which is rare these days since she lives in Denver – but so she could keep my nerves at bay.
What is a money tree gift? A money tree gift is a hand-made creation that resembles a tree shape and incorporates actual folded paper dollars into the design. It can be a very personalized and unique sediment gift. Sometimes we may feel that giving the gift of money is a bit impersonal although practical. Money envelopes or gift certificate cards can seem boring and uneventful, although useful as well.
Gardeners and the horticultural trade often refer to true geraniums as "hardy geraniums", to distinguish them from the less hardy pelargoniums (generally grown as annuals in temperate climes), and most garden "geraniums" (without the 'hardy' appellation) are in fact pelargoniums (storksbills), as opposed to true geraniums (cranesbills).
There is space for me on the road.
Of complete and utter
As the boys drove up to the shack, they saw Clydesdale laying in his usual place, stretched out, covering the third step completely. Old man Clooney was nowhere to be found. “Clooney?” Freddie yelled. “I told you he could be gone!” Joshua stated. “Shut uo Josh. He ain’t gone.” J.P replied. “Clooney?” Jaxon screamed. “What the hell do you boys want?” Old man Clooney asked as he walked out of the cabin. “Don’t you know it’s past midnight?” He said as he continued to scold the boys. “We need some shine, Clooney.” Jaxon answered. ”You got any weed?” Freddie asked. “I don’t sell weed. I plant it. I harvest it, and I smoke it. It keeps me young.” Clooney said as he reached into his overall pocket and pulled out a joint. “I got some shine. You know where it is.” He stated. Jaxon walked over to Clydesdale and demanded, “Get off the steps you mangy piece of ..” “Don’t disrespect my dog J.P.” Clooney demanded.
They were so pretty I didn't even want to cut them up.....but after I added my own style like doodling, stamping, and some rub ons-
He will do what needs to be done to form a relationship with you; and honestly if he’s that confused do you want a relationship with him anyway? Letting go of a confused man within the first few months of dating is much easier than being left by a confused man after a few years of dating.
A day of respect for fatherhood.
But if the same values have been consistently understood over the ages to say that sexual activity belongs within the lifelong marriage of one man and one woman, then moving away from that is something that can only be done with great care, and with some sense that we are genuinely not changing the Biblical faith but understanding it better. The Christian church worldwide is right in the middle of this debate, and the Church of England still stands by its inherited understanding of marriage.
*Thanks to Beth Spann, Kristin Plambeck, Christine Hoffman, MaryAnn Popovich, Darlene O'Donnell and Mary Hastings for making my student-teaching experience meaningful.
Potential to grow, potential to wither.
Amanda is someone I've only met once before, I think. We agree on a lot of topics online and that may be where any bond we have to one another lies- we've known each other online for several years. Amanda isn't a "friend" of mine but she is part of the group of moms that I care about deeply.
There's been a rather melancholy and stressed feeling in our house the last couple of days. We leave in a week from today. And I have this horrible feeling that this is the last time for a very long time that I'm going to be in Gaspé. I hope this feeling isn't accurate. Even though it's been so many years, I love that place, that land, deeply. I want to stay longer than just a few days when we head up there, even though we could only really extend things a couple more days anyway, since we have commitments back home.
A major focus of Transition Newcastle is creating strong local communities and I think that the planning weekend really demonstrated a way of working that was inclusive, welcoming and helped build social capital. There were a few new people and I think they felt welcomed. I think the informal nature of the house was actually quite conducive to a positive working environment. While we worked hard, I think everybody was positive about spending the time together.
OOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAIIIIIIIIE
Saturday, November 3rd–Did I get paid today?
The mini-vacation was soon at an end, and Mr. Glad and I had to say good-bye to our friends and drive back down to the flatlands. But not so fast -- we stopped to take another short hike to a place where we might get a good view of Horsetail Falls off Highway 50.
Nik T’ress stepped over the severed head of a Twi’lek male as he entered the foyer of the Koi Pearl, a multi-level nightclub nestled in the upper levels of Nar Shadda. His helmet’s vocalizor gave his voice a mechanical edge to it as he attempted to get the nearest cleaning droid’s attention.
2.” Chinamaringa is the beginning of the House of Chinamora. 4. An ing out of Chinamaringa and Wafanenombo having same mother three houses we created.
What have you been up to lately? Are you enjoying your summer? We finally have sun in my state! Hallelujah!!! Go figure the first day I spent in it, I got fried. Literally cooked like a lobster. That teaches me (a redhead with fair skin) to spend a day at the waterpark with spf 4. Idiot.
THE CRUSHING
KITCHEN DUTY
It's my blog and I'll post what I like! ;-) Candy strip cotton shirts, over the shoulder yellow Benetton jumpers, rolled up beige chinos and pumps, funky bass and wah-wah guitar, latin congas & bongos with muffled horns & trumpets. Darlings of the NME for just one week and we loved them! For Crispin.
Speaking of the subways and what not, I just learned that only two years into his six year contract MTA Board head Jay Walder is leaving for a gig outta town. He will stay on until October of this year, then he's Hong Kong bound.
William raised his voice. "I said, 'You've got the prettiest face I've ever seen.'"
Kane County Flea Market
And then she did something that shocked me to my core. She reached down to the hem of her long skirt, pulled it all the way up to her waist, and took it off!!! I couldn't believe my eyes. What was she doing?!? *Why* was she doing this? I couldn't have been more shocked or confused. The look on my face must have been priceless.
A big thanks to Nate and Joe for helping out, and to the former for continued use of this AG rig.
not used to the dense darkness.
See, I actually have curly hair, but I use tons of Suave Sleek Styling Cream, and straighten it so I don't look like a crazy old witch with a squirrel's nest for hair. Actually, curly isn't quite right. It's not exactly curly. Nor is it straight. It's more "Roseanne Roseannadanna-ish" For some odd reason, a lot of people complimented me on it. Come to think of it, there was wine at this event. That's explains it. Anyway, to answer your question, Michelle, I'm not purposely keeping it curly because it looks stupid like that. However, these days, oftentimes I simply don't have time to straighten it. Those are the days I don a Cubs hat.
But I spent some pretty crucial years in Nashville and Middle Tennessee, as well as a pretty significant number of days throughout childhood and my teen years. My phone number started with 615 (back in ancient times before there were more than two area codes) for a good portion of the Eighties. It’s almost as much home to me as Northwest Tennessee is.
MW: That’s because there was no benefit, and I know that there’s nothing in the report that shows it. One United Bank did not get any immediate help from the Treasury. The Bank then went to the private market and got $20 million in loans to help them stabilize their lending. The bank’s investors did not lose anything. The way I see it the committee took bits from conversation and information between staff members about the economic crisis and the Treasury’s role in it and then pieced them together to try to make something out of it. And it’s not fair.
So, I'm just clicking away, taking family snapshots which are a different animal altogether from photographs although sometimes a family snapshot does rise to the level of a photography. But sometimes, I just set the camear on automatic and use it as a point and shoot camera although it is a bit heavier.
Making the Beast with Two Backs
So although it’s more apparent for photons, for electrons, for the submicroscopic objects, our belief is that all reality,all manifest reality, all matter, is governed by the same laws. And if that is so, then this experiment is telling us that we should change our worldview because we, too, are quantum objects.
apparently, the vodacom man tells me, they've corrected their sim swap fuckup at last and it should be working.
AJ Jenkins at number 30, just doesn’t make sense to me. Most analysts struggled to place him in their Top 100 overall prospects, so to draft him in the 1st round when receiving options like Coby Fleener and Stephen Hill are still on the board doesn’t present good value. The only thing that makes up for this selection, is the selection of Cam Johnson in the 7th round. Mike Mayock had him in his top 50 prospects, so a 2nd round prospect falling to the 7th round undoubtedly presents good value, but you have to question why he fell that far. Grade C
Buona sera cara,
Heat the chicken stock in a pot. In another pot, sauté the onions in the melted butter until they are translucent. Add the flour and stir for about 2 minutes then pour in the hot chicken stock. Simmer and stir until thick. Add pepper and cream, chicken pieces, carrots, peas, and parsley.
We eat meat about once a week usually, and only organic and that feels right. Local, wild, killed anyway meat seems even righter. I regret not taking any pictures but we were so caught up in the moment that it didn't even cross my mind.
Slice down the sides of the vanilla beans and scrape out the seeds. Add to the sugar. Add the beans to the sugar. Cover the jar and shake well. Let sit for a couple of weeks, shaking the jar occasionally to mix.
"I think that a right-wing blogger making an association between a kaffiyeh and terrorism is just an example of how so much of the complexity of Arab culture has been reduced to a very narrow vision of the Arab world on the part of some people in the U.S.," Bishara said in a phone interview. "Kaffiyehs are worn every day on the street by Palestinians and other people in the Middle East -- by people going to work, going to school, taking care of their families, and just trying to keep warm."
This is another very clear example where the creed of "Physician, heal thy self" is perfectly appropriate.
2 small onions, diced
Use a pan that has a tight-fitting lid and is large enough to hold the meatballs in one layer. I use a 6-3/4 quart Le Creuset Wide French Oven, which is called a Risotto Pan
I have to say, I've been an ardent fan of Fiona Walker since picking up French Relations - although I found that her more recent outings had lost a little of their sparkle for me in comparison to her earlier work. Of all her characters Tash and Hugo are by far my favourite (after the novels French Relations and Well Groomed) and I was rather nervous to see how Walker continued their story.
Anyway, if you know of anyone who has some expertise in the field of Mediterranean history, and you wouldn’t mind forwarding this post to them, I’d be very grateful indeed. Thanks in advance, Declan.
(I used SU papers and ribbon - thanks Kimmie.. and coloured him with PM's and Copics)
I’ve spent a lot of time over the past few weeks reading about the professional soldier and some of the issues faced by the US Army in managing the professional force. The number of articles on the topic suggests there is an issue that needs to be addressed.
I hope you have a great day and get some stamping time in for yourself. Later taters!
(I am 99.9% sure none of them read this blog !!)
Last night we did take them on our date with us. We saw Transformers and then went to Iggy's for dinner. Truly, they are pretty fun kids but let's just say next weeks date night will NOT include any children. (Oh and while at dinner we had a discussion of the language in the movie and how it is an example of what NOT to say. Sheesh, it is like some words are just common now) (Yes, I realize it is rated PG-13)
U is for unbelievable, though I originally wrote it as "s for silver." Sorry for another tourista post. :) But Taxco is worth posting about, because, well...refer to title above.
*And, uh, this isn't really news, since the ticker is right at the top of the page staring us all in the face, but apparently Bobbie is coming soon. I'm in some denial about that and feeling eager to finish winding up my affairs at work, and nesting at home, so that I feel ready. But I suspect you never really feel ready for number two.
We paced up and down each deck exploring our options. Privately I wanted to join the kids creche playing on the deck, or the secret corner of Chinese pensioners engaged in mah jong with quiet intensity.
163. “Success is often the result of taking a misstep in the right direction.” – Al Bernstein
Haven and Iaian has been living in Rome happily for over a year when Beau was kidnapped, and there's no other choice but for Haven to go back to New York and save him. A group called Horae claims that they can help Haven if she can help them trap Adam Rosier, who is their mortal enemy. Things that happened next are complicated. Then it got more and more complicated. Lies after lies are being told to Haven by opposite sides and she believes the other one first, then the second, and I really can't blame the girl because even I myself don't know who can be trusted and whoever is telling lies. Once you get to a conclusion, another situation springs up and everything you’ve believed turned out to be wrong and then you'll find yourself more and more confused. I really hate it when people lie to me because sometimes I really can’t tell if it’s really a lie. I trust people so much, and give them the benefit of the doubt, and Haven is also like that.I have to say Haven’s character was relatable this time. I like how independent she turned out to be. She made decisions by herself, and if I’m faced with those problems, I really will find myself in a jungle of questions on who to trust, and who really is saying the truth. In the end, thankfully, things have been stitched on together, and it shocked me to know that those who seem to be bad might not be totally bad, vice versa. But i have to warn you of the cliff-hanger- it's very perturbing, it adds another question to what we have concluded in the end.
I worried about doing this project, wondering if it was too soon to re-immerse myself into the world of grief, even if only through fictional characters, but I jumped in with both feet. And now here I am, crying again.
“I tout I toll you’s to stay on East Fort?”
What I want to do is get rid of the js-kit comments and if necessary switch to a new blog site, that is simple and clear. I need to preserve the almost 2000 posts and if possible the many thousands of comments.
Let's not pretend that these two were not very, very radical. They were indeed so radical, that few people, if anyone, have been able to keep up with their radical ideas and activities. It's too hard.
Interest – savings and Checking accounts
Once I heard that, I could see where he was coming from. I did not think he was saying 'all children's writers have half a brain', that would be false logic. He was just explaining his own writing stance and he is entitled to do that. He writes literary fiction for adults, as such he sees it as his task to write to the top of his register and would not, could not accept any restraints on that.
And leprechauns are sore losers.
Another key piece of the 1984 Donruss set puzzle. The George Brett card brings me down to needing under 30 cards. This could be the next set I complete -- seeing as I haven't gotten my paws on the 2011 A&G Manny Ramirez card yet.
“So be sure when you step, Step with care and great tact.
I am not jumping into any conclusions,
Occasionally, he would get creative. And while most meals went over well (Chicken and Broccoli, sucka!), one blindsided us completely: Texas Chainsaw Chili and Spaghetti Squash, a.k.a. Two Terrible Tastes That Tasted Like Evil Together.
Today I thought it would be fun to make a banner for my daughter's bedroom door. I used some Country Drive 6x6 papers from Echo Park and then layered all of the Die-namics together. I started with the Jumbo Banner Day STAX Die-namics as the base and then added the very fabulous Fishtail Flags STAX Die-namics and of course, Mini Circles Doily Die-namics paired with By the Letters Uppercase Die-namics for her name.
Guan Eng’s Attempt To Save Self From Embarrassment – Tee Siew Kiong – Wednesday, 22 February 2012 00:15
Hello everyone. I hope you all had a wonderful and creative weekend. I'm still feeling a bit yucky but doing better.
I hadn't had it for years, but decided that French Onion soup would be great for dinner. When I got home I Googled the recipe. As I read through it, though, I realized I had a problem...the recipe called for 3 1/2 hours of cooking time, and overnight refrigeration to meld the flavors together. I wanted to eat it in 90 minutes. However, with some creative thinking I was able to put dinner on the table right on time. If the soup suffered for it, I didn't notice.
About a year ago I went to a black journalism event and I met this young guy that was handsome and very self confident. We talked for a long time about work and exchanged businesses cards with the intention of connecting again but I honestly never followed up. Why, you might ask? Because the night I met him he just seemed like he was into something else other than me. He told me that he wanted to be in a relationship but his “swag” was so large that I just assumed that he would be into someone more ……beautiful than me.
Finally, I decided to not worry about names and just read assuming that I will figure them out eventually. Once I was past that initial inhibition, I was hooked to the book. It is truly a masterpiece by a great story-teller. The book is a story of Russian aristocratic family in the time of Tsar and Napoleon’s invasion of Russia. The story revolves around the central character of “Natasha” ﻿(﻿﻿﻿﻿﻿Countess Natalia Ilyinichna Rostova) superbly performed by Audrey Hepburn in the movie adaptation. I have mentioned the full name to indicate why it was difficult for me to understand names.
Like Lazarus, I have returned. For the first time in a long time, I feel close to the person I thought I always was. However, there is a issue with that: the healthier I feel, the more restless I get.
Such simplicity. No fuss. No preconceptions. No misconceptions. Nothing to worry about: Just laying on the grass in a garden chasing imaginary cars as time goes by.
Nous avons des voleurs de tomates. Les écureuils qui envahissent le jardin sont les premiers accusés.
here are my tools used to make the stencil:
